*Then, I wrecked my bike in the rain that following Monday. I wasn't hurt but my bike was damaged, $1200 worth. I'm supposed to get it back today. It's supposed to pour-down rain today. Lovely.
PLEASE FORWARD TO ALL OF YOUR CONTACTS, TOGETHER WE CAN AND WILL MAKE A DIFFERENCE!- THANK YOU!
I am here for work until Friday. Anyone know any great places to eat that I need to try or things I need to do that I can squeeze in?
I started to feel lots of pressure in my bum. I remember thinking “no! That can’t possibly be what I think it is. I’m no way near pushing a baby out!” Then all of a sudden, no pushing, there was a head. I was on my hands and knees and all of a sudden this head popped out! I screamed at Steven “HEAD!”
I'm working on my life/work balance and, while I really love my job, I need to make the time to do the things I like to do (like writing and such).
1) You will be blessed if you do not stray from your goal…(in my case it is to lose more weight). You should stop dreaming and longing of things that have no benefit to you (such as the unhealthy comfort foods that I need to avoid) these things can take your life away.
WHO, then, IN PARTICULAR, is agitating for the turn lane, and why won't they name themselves? And what connections might they have to the individuals sitting on the GPATS board?
~ the “sciences” of demonology and angelology
the items with your
Touch. This is a show of epic proportions and everyone should watch it.
But, Mr. Obama explains to his handler, he needs more time, and he needs to get into a position where he is no longer answerable to American voters.
This, too, shall pass away !
Includes 2 CR2032 batteries installed (plus an extra set of batteries) and protective pouch.
I started to really cramp up here and hate myself. I was really frustrated. I stopped and stretched for a few minutes. I needed to calm down since I was falling apart and I knew my goal was not going to be met. I thought about just calling it quits right there since I was unable to keep fluids down. Looking back I am glad I didn’t but maybe I should have?
Some couples find planning the look of the reception to be the most fun, while others the most nerve-wracking! Coming up with a color scheme to match your flowers, linen, paper products, wedding cake, etc. can be hard if you don’t really know where to start and how to tie everything together. But with so many great online tools, this part of the process can be fun! I recently discovered COLOURlovers, a free website that allows you to create and share color ideas and palettes. For DIY brides, this tool is great because not only can you provide your vendors with your Inspiration (thank you Pinterest :p), you can also provide an exact color palette to work with.
Wal: Ok so here’s the thing. I came to know recently that the polar bear was interested as well. And you know…. I kinda have a thing for her…. And I dunno… Not like I realllly want to do this you know. Anyway, I have endured this camp easily enough and can easily claim a place in the wagon for myself. I dunno.. I think I should let her continue the job the Narwhal did.
Extras: Wild Orchid Craft Flowers, Pearls, Corner Punch, Ribbon, Petal Cone Die
“I can’t ride with you.”
lip stick. Hee Hee..
and to try
We all are leaders irrespective of our job role. And an Effective Leader is Assertive.
Me: So what do you recommend I do?
Somewhere down the line, we’ve substituted plug-ins and candles instead of pot roast made in the crock pot and homemade pie for desert. Favorite family recipes are collecting dust in cabinets; long forgotten. Cooking shows are the rage and I know many people love to cook but we’ve forsaken the family meals and Sunday dinners. Treasure your family time and spending time with good friends because nothing else can beat the real thing. (Deuteronomy 26:18: The Lord has declared this day that you are His treasured people as He promised)
There are a lot of similarities between alcohol addiction and drug addiction. And differences too; like alcohol being legally (usually) and easily available. In this sense, the alcoholic doesn’t live in fear of being picked up and have his urine tested, detained and charged in court.
What is your dream job?
Centre weighted auto exposure; exposure compensation: +2 ~ -2EV at 0.5 step
In one scene Spooner tries to destroy Hurst's grasp of the past: by querying if he did have the wife he has been boasting of. In the following Scene Hurst produces a photograph album which he seems to offer as evidence against Spooner's attempt to deny him the past of his reminiscences or conceiving. Is he getting back at Spooner or reassuring himself?
If you have a hammer:
Potential dangers
Secondly, because it's long, you can be guaranteed the child will "root" (wiggle), which will result in a quick smack in the top of their head from whoever's plaiting. Oh, and this so happens to adults, as well. Also if a Black female is braiding your hair, don't reach up to touch it. The comb is a dangerous weapon!
General Charles E. Wilhelm, USMC (Ret.)
Consider these noble words of Umar ibn al-Khattab (ra) to Sad ibn Abi Waqqas (ra) as he bade farewell to the Muslim army that was to confront the Persians at Qadisiyyah.
Many people are familiar with building raised beds, but typically when people build them they simply pile up soil, maybe within a wooden or stone border, and plant in that. This is okay, but it can be improved by the very simple addition of piled up wood underneath the soil. Sepp Holzer, a permaculture farmer in Austria, builds permaculture beds six feet high, but for most of us we'll probably do them smaller. You could even dig down, pile up the wood, and then cover it in soil, thereby getting more wood in there without the height.
16. Cut & Run, argues that the Welfare State is a clever strategy developed by Big Capital. It is like a State run Truck System.
In furniture, mirrored surfaces, inlaid woods, and exotic material such as shagreen (sharkskin) and zebra, along with exotic woods such as rosewood and ebony were favorites of Art Deco designers.”
As I write this with conviction, I am still waffling back and forth. Do you save only the big stuff for Him or do you give Him everything?
Was she used?
The first two nights of NFFTY 2012 have been incredible! I am so thankful to have had the opportunity to intern at NFFTY, which led to the opportunity to submit a film to the festival, which led to actually having my short accepted and screened at the festival; all of which has led to this amazing weekend!
Last year, I didn't fare so well in that stage. It was brutal. I think I've grown since then, but probably not. We'll see. This year I swear to bite my tongue if I don't agree with my reviewer.
This option works for both the Itouch and IPhone. However, you need Internet access to get to the handbooks. So if you have your Itouch and you do not have Internet access you won't be able to see the handbooks. If you have your IPhone, you can do this but depending if you are on the G network, E network or wifi will depend on the speed of which the handbook will load.
- Watching Bailey win the starring role on Legally Blonde (which I had guessed since I saw Bailey outside a theatre on my last trip to NYC)
Creepily subdued (cheerful even, and more effective for it), teen impotence and Rock
But when I started researching cases like yours, and telling them what I found, they suddenly understood, and not only supported me, but offered sympathy for you and what you were going through.
Et dit au pauvre : ami, viens jeûner avec moi.
Towards the end of last year, in a moment of temporary insanity, I declared that I would try 40 new recipes in 40 days and post about each one until the new year. It was a crazy and exhilarating experience. This year, I have better control over my impulsive behavior. Still, I am keen on making the best of what's left of 2010 and cooking and baking to my heart's content.
Sorry for the hiatus, everyone; I've been in France. (If you want to know why you can read my more domestic blog on www.maryhoffman.co.uk)
- Dark chocolate sponge
The grain bill was:
- From the movie "The Mirror Has Two Faces" -
But, hey. There you go. Why should travelling to Europe and back change the World?
Mark Halperin of Time :
It is, of course, somewhat tempting to take “liberal” and “conservative” as being marketing and rhetorical terms rather than having much value in categorizing political views. After all, people who identify as liberals take being a liberal to involve the virtues of tolerance, acceptance and so on while regarding conservatives as clinging to an unjust past out of fear of change. In response, those who identify as conservatives often see themselves as defending what is good and holy from the depravity of the godless liberals and their agenda.
"Business robberies have also increased, so when you are at work you are also at risk. Shopping malls and restaurants are all places of work, which means that you are never safe," said Burger.
If you are traveling to Italy in the summer Tory Burch has great outfits for the lovely weather. I will definitely being doing some trend watching and style observing while I spend my mornings drinking cafe and eating all of the pastries I can get.
My sperm donor left me with abandonment issues that are still harming me today.
I have been working on being consistent and firm in the classroom. I work to employ my consequences evenly and dispassionately so that the students know that rules are rules and that punishments are not personal. I have expectations in this class and if they are not met, there will be behavior checks, staying after class, and detentions. I value your education, which is why I refuse to let you squander it. On the other hand, I am also working to establish positive relationships with my students by connecting on a personal level, making time for chats and jokes, and with phone calls home. Some days are easier than others. Some moments are easier than others. I sometimes feel overwhelmed and frustrated. I can't get over the feeling that I am just winging it and just crossing my fingers that they all learn something.
Hard right to the body by Justin, and both fighter are starting to find their distance. Chaote land s a jab. Leg kick lands for Justin.
I lie
I first discovered what was killing these men.
3. Wake the World
Specialists in superior coffee, owners Nicolas and David aim to bring high-quality brew to Paris - a city more traditionally renowned for its weak yet acrid cups of sock-juice espresso. Here the concise menu proposes espresso, filter coffee, noisette or white coffee - and each is prepared with care using excellent ingredients and specialist equipment.
My first book in the Debut Author Challenge for this year (finally!).
I noticed that the images displayed on the screen during these sexually explicit commercials, which relentlessly attempts to brainwash viewers to sms “PORN” to number xxxxxx, are ALL WHITE WOMAN. This got me thinking…. because I know for a fact that commercials on e-TV are targeted at the ‘previously disadvantaged’ Black community of this democrazy cuntreee!
I'm going to be in Seattle, WA, USA from 27th August to 5th September, staying with a (non-dancing) friend.
So with a year’s understanding under their belt and the newly confirmed status as the RenaultSport factory team, the RB8 has taken a step forwards in KERS packaging. Now the energy storage appears to be slightly revised, with the unit inside the gearbox swapped for floor mounted units. In this exclusive picture from MichaelD in Melbourne, we can see the units remain fitted to the floor when it’s removed. The two carbon fibre cases are closed with aluminium tops and are provided with electrical and cooling connections. They sit in the final section of flat floor known as the boat tail.
Let me just pause here a minute. Did I even mention to you that I haven't pulled my sewing machine out in months, and now I was planning to tackle making my first slipcovers? No? Well, yes, I was petrified. The last thing I made were these straight seam orange curtains, and these envelope fold chevron fabric pillows... For some reason, winding the bobbin, sewing rounded seams instead of straight... all these things gave me the heebie jeebies. I don't know why I was so scared. Really. I think I was most concerned about getting the tread all tangled up in the insides of the machine because I did something small and stupid. But, alas, reading directions helps! Even though the poor translation of these Janome instructions made us laugh the first time I used the machine, months back, this time was serious and I had to pay attention to what they said... Outcome? It worked. Just fine. Now I'm not scared. End the pause.
Overall, this kit is a great way to try the brand, use for travel, and get better skin. Both myself and my friend really enjoyed the products in the kit, and liked the way they smelled. I'd recommend checking it out!
I went home for my high school reunion (next blog) and we celebrated Claire and Charlotte's birthdays. Claire turned 3 on August 15th and Charlie turned 1 on August 31st! Happy birthday beautiful nieces :)
Sweet Potato Fries
Nor I would argue are our kids passive victims ripe for commercial organisations. They are actually rather savvy, and I think understand very well what commercial organisations are trying to do when they communicate with them, particularly when it comes to engagement online.Hmm, I wonder which clowns are promoting such concepts, eh? Vested interests who are looking only to their next pay cheque, perchance?
**Don't Forget that's it's Friday, so it's Mega Swagbucks Day! If you are not a member yet, go Here to sign up! Its Free to sign up, then download the Swagbucks toolbar to remind you to Search the web and Win Swagbucks!!! You can then redeem your Swagbucks for Free prizes, such as Gift cards!
Written: AvaElectric
Elizabeth: I’m working on a book whose working title is Bavarian Blue. It’s set in WWI Hoboken, New Jersey. Few people know that when WWI erupted, President Woodrow Wilson evicted the Germans of Hoboken from their homes and businesses. because of the strategic location of the town just across the river from NYC. Hoboken was predominantly populated by people of German ancestry. It changed the complexion of the town, giving the more newly arrived Irish and Italian the jobs and power in town.
Lemon Tart with Raspberry coulis
And everyone’s heart flies
care. Made with fine finished edges.
Consensus: The tone may be a disjointed, the laughs may not be constant, and the run-time may be about 30 minutes too long, but The Five-Year Engagement still entertains enough with it’s very funny laughs, and it’s charming leads, that are backed by an amazing supporting cast that steals the scenes almost every chance they get.
into the Dangote group,
Peter Randall Page had been invited to show work at the Octagon Chapel – a fantastic venue, as I have said before. An exhibition of both his drawings and sculptures. The drawings were large and on thick, textile-like, watercolour paper, or fabric canvas, in pencil and charcoal. Dark, expressive, structural, evoking natural forms. The sculptures were between hard and soft-hard stone yet carved to a smooth, cushion-like finish. A very good use of the space.
Imagine their astonishment when I told them that Jeff was born in York County. In fact, Jeff was born and raised in my current home town of Dover, Pa and has become the highest paid and most well known sculptor in the U.S. Many people think his work is kitschy. Okay, the subject matter is kitschy, but the interpretation, in my opinion, is brilliant.
Watch episode after episode, because I’m sure most of his inventions are fundamentally sound and would work in real life. If you can make a solar powered laser beam from a pistachio, a soiled prophylactic and your own eyeball, trust me, you’ll do fine in THUNDERDOME WORLD.
Hope your new year is off to a good start! Mr Corgi and I are going to try "No Web Wednesday" after work today, but I will try to get a tutorial of my slider card up in the next couple of days. Until then, enjoy the direction the wind takes you!
she is bossy
Superfluid Superluminal Centrifuge
and a resulting 3-day hospital stay for our beloved miss dee
Finely grind cookies with sugar and salt in a food processor. With motor running, add butter, blending until combined. Press mixture evenly onto bottom of baking pan. Bake 10 minutes, then cool in pan on a rack 5 minutes.
His campaign aimed to “make white folks angry” at his opponent, the Liberal Democrat’s Elwyn Watkins, as part of a desperate bid to retain his seat in the run up to the May 2010 general election. Whipping up hysteria and rhetoric that could make him a Tea Party candidate in America, Woolas is now barred from the House of Commons and ordered to pay £5,000 and costs to Mr Watkins.
Last but not least: Always keep revisiting and updating the list. This will apply for your future clients as well.
1/4 cup sweet rice flour
Oh and I’ll be taking all my made up Aspen’s too. I have just finished knitting a tiny one, to fit a 12-18month size
wallet was sitting on the counter. I reached for it, considered reconsidering, then took it anyway. It had been months since I’d actually left her large house. I washed my hair, put on a yellow sundress and pink sandals, then went out for breakfast at 2 p.m. I ordered eggs benedict with fresh fruit and breakfast
I’ve got
There is nothing to dislike in this book. Even if you are not a continuous reader, you can easily read one story and pick up from the next one after 15 days.
The drawers under the bunkbeds hold things like stuffed animals and baby dolls. Before we moved, each child chose two sets of toys they wanted to bring.
So, in honor of Holocaust Remembrance Day in Israel, I've been reading one chapter...I think maybe I'll post it separately if people are interested. So - a quiet Sabbath. Next week will be a busy one as Wednesday is Memorial Day and Thursday is Independence Day.
Here's a SSO question: I've been worried about you. You mentioned having marital problems. I'm sorry to pry...are things okay?
I have another pretty sick student that has been out all week with Pneumonia! Three in my class are on antibiotics for Strep and now the 4th has Pneumonia. I think I'm going to have to start bleaching desks at the end of each day!!!
It is a time of transition; change in the trees and in the skies, and yet of stillness; autumn evenings run into one another with a smooth sameness; every night sky the same velvety moleskine black, with only the mutations of the moon for diversity.
(this above picture literally gives me hives)
Disclaimer: I am not paid to advertise any of the above businesses nor I am sponsored by them. I am just suggesting the businesses which I find reliable and trustworthy. My suggestions are somewhat tips from a local so I hope you will also do other researches too. Please do not rely solely on my blogpost before you come here because I am not a professional travel guide.
I am suggesting we set aside a few extra dollars each month to help someone less fortunate.
The woman bent over in front of me reminded me of Jamie Gertz. She was perhaps not as beautiful as the real one, but a very decent knock-off. It was enough of an illusion to get me rock hard. For the next two hours I explored many ways of defiling her. To my amusement, she didn’t seem to mind.
Here is the video I made to go with my Merry Monday card and Card-Spiration Challenge 11
Okay! It’s true!
31 That's Why God Made the Radio
According to the Muslim belief, the forces to battle the one eyed beast would rise from the area of Khurasan that comprises of portion of Iran, Pakistan, Afghanistan and part of Central Asia. If the anti-Christ forces have assembled in Afghanistan, it’s not a coincidence but well thought out Zionist strategy to take on Pakistan, the nuclear power of the Muslim world so its free to advance other Muslim territories without any fear.
Nick just informed me I was way off.
Bush has always loved to make an unusual voice even more
Every year at around this time my husband and I have to learn to dart quickly around our garden holding tea trays over heads for fear of plummeting pears. Not really, but they do come down pretty quick and make a hell of a racket banging onto the lawn.
Complete chapter 4 of episode 1.
5 Bodyline - now this is a new one to my list and i dont know how my stuff is because i accidentally got it sent to my
Ick. This is my knee as of this morning, a little over a week since I took a fall in my last 5k. As you can tell, it’s healing albeit rather slowly. There was a point last week that it wasn’t looking too good and I had to get serious with the care routine. I’d have hoped that by this point I’d have more new skin rather than his gaping hole in my knee. It’s painful, disgusting and it’s really brought me down.
Words are also important in a garden. They may make you smile or pause for thought and lettering is an art in itself.
He stands back to sigh
Possible: “Man or Muppet” and “Life’s a Happy Song” – Bret McKenzie and “Pictures in My Head” – Jeannie Lurie, Aris Archontis, and Chen Neeman (Original Song); Long Shot: Jason Segel and Nicholas Stoller (Adapted Screenplay)
In case you need further convincing, this is the only sound sample I could scrounge up on the web. In keeping with the confusing history of this recording, someone has delayed the fuck out of one of the tracks and slapped it over some unrelated video of Thai dancing, apparently trying to pass it off as something they taped on their last vacation? Who knows. I think the original recording does quite nicely without the sonic tinkering, but here it is, for preview purposes only:
B5 Come With Us 2:38
These elements were reinterpreted in a new order:
Once upon a time I put up a few posts called "A Day in the Life," which consisted of pictures I took on a regular normal day. I guess I was trying to be artsy or something. On Wednesday I decided to do it again. I took a camera with me to work and got myself psyched up to take some pictures.
One of the big dangers is that one admits to guilt but there is not change. Repentance demands a change. David repentance drives him away from his selfishness. John the Baptist tried to explain this when he preached on repentance in Luke 3:7-14. Penance simply says I am guilty and I will start doing good works. Repentance says, there is no excuse, I am sinful to the core but I will throw myself own God’s mercy and begin to live as He commands, “To love the Lord my God with all my heart and my neighbor as myself.”
Fire - something that plagues all of us in these hot conditions at this time of year. You only have to hear a distant helicopter and we are sniffing the air and checking the horizon for signs of fire. Its actually quite a scary thing and something the Spanish dont seem to get too hot under the collar about.
nobody would choose the bad things
No wait, I am.
into another room and work on my album I can
Forcing the use of the lazy eye
to all the Earth
The corporate suits still controlled the game
In GA we visited , Coca Cola museum, Toured CNN studios, ate great food at Plates and Buckhead club. Centennial Gardens welcomed us with Butterflies and Birds of Pray show.
In eggshell hallways, calls, propels
Troy Perry (Troy): I remember my dad and granddad watching porn movies. They would tell me to close my eyes during the X-rated scenes, but I would peek through my hands to watch too. So I was exposed to it at a really young age. Then when I was around the age of 13, I remember finding a magazine. I took it and hid it under the mattress.
and my adorable Granddaughter. I was doing a photo shoot
This was a really tough thing to do, thinking of myself as the Head Honcho and laying down a blueprint of a company or a call to arms to others under my commnad. I do not want to steer a boat loaded with people who want to be steered by me. I want to be on my own, doing my own thing, irresponsibly. I have been Head Honcho of my family for as long as I remember and it was finally good in the last few years to say, now I do things for myself. This did not mean I would take on the reins of a company, even my own. Running a home is like being in charge of a company, a industry, and I just don’t want it anymore. I want to lead a free and unfettered life, not be responsible for anything but my own life, I do not want to be dependent nor have dependents. Of course, I am always there for my family and friends should they need me, but I am more of a loner. I like my time and space to myself, which being the Head Honcho of any company cannot give me.
Then I started reading up on it, and woah! Not only is that stuff edible, but it has huge health benefits too. But first I had to go and find one, so I said to Eddie the Beagle, I said: "Eddie, we're on a mission!". So I put my shoes on, donned my camouflage gear, explorer helmet, butterfly net and hunting rifle, put my trusted hunting beagle on his lead and stepped through my front door into the great wilderness. It took me a total of about 10 seconds before I spotted the first one simply growing out of our own wall!
Nearby is the kiddie pool, which is near the boardwalk and exit to the beach. The older kids are permitted to leave the facility and walk along the boardwalk or swim in the Atlantic. They are stamped on their shoulders with an invisible ink that shows under a purple ultraviolet light, which proves they are members when they return. Under the boardwalk wait their friends who do not have the money to enter. They position themselves back-to-back and rub the stamp onto their buddies’ shoulders so they are allowed in.
how did i survive this long without you?!
He desireth to shew openly herein, that He is God by Nature, since one must needs deem that He Who came forth from God the Father, is surely God also, not having the honour from without, as we have, but being in truth what He is believed to be. With exceeding skill does He say this, having joined therewith the love of God the Father to us, well and opportunely coming to discourse thereon. For He shames the unbelieving Nicodemus, yea rather, He shews that he is ungodly also. For the not coming readily to believe, when God teaches anything, what else is it, than laying upon the Truth a charge of falsehood? Besides this, in saying that He was given for the life of the world, He persuades him to consider seriously, of how great punishment they will be in danger, who from their mad folly, have made of no account so wondrous grace of God the Father. For God, says He, so loved the world that He gave His Only Begotten Son.
~CHRIS MATTHEW SCIABARRA, visiting scholar, department of politics, New York University, and author of Ayn Rand: The Russian RadicalMs Mercer, by the way, is a South African who migrated to the US, so she knows all about the difficulties of setting up in a new country.
Mixed materials; Mortared mexican pebbles, cut limestone and vegetation. If the latter wasn't there, it would look hard.
1/2 avocado
13. Road Ladies
after Blue I, II, III by Joan Miró
two suspects confessed
Terry”Geezer”
that wrapped your soul
There was three pages of that kind of stuff not including the four or five other online assessments including advanced numerical reasoning (math geekery - which is greater? 1/59-1/95 or 1/37-1/73), pattern analysis (think Rohrshach ink blots meets Sesame Street "which one of these is most like the other"), personality inventories, etc. It was an evening of fun and self discovery for the whole family. Not really...it did take the whole evening...by myself...in the office. It was like taking the GRE and LSAT all over again...with the full knowledge that someone was going to use the information to make a recommendation about my "suitability".
I think you should name those rats Jimmy and Cagney cause "you dirty rats" is best said in a Cagney sneer.
The simple truth is that there are a very large number of books being pigeonholed into a small list of broad category genres.
Have you ever stopped to think of the significance of those two phrases that are nearly burned into the brains of Olivetians?
consulting the star signs, the astrology of the
My den is in the garden of the place occupied by MHM. This is my place. Only MHM goes there, only MHM is allowed in there. He is the Alpha in this territory.
There are many things on my mind as I pack, now at the end of an intense week in Cambodia, ranging from intense strategic discussions, inspiring and humbling accounts from our programmes and a harrowing backdrop of the all too recent genocide in the Khmer Rouge years. Captain Paranoia is still with me constantly, but the events of the week have meant that he has had to compete for my attention.
Yep. I’m sure they think that’s ok, at least.
I am currently sitting in the Detroit airport waiting to board my final flight and I am EXCITED! As are the rest of the team! My flight from Seattle was smooth and uneventful, unlike my trip through the border. But all is well that ends well. One day I will remember to NOT wear my drama queen boy shorts when crossing the border. UGH!
Our tummies were still upset so I had the genius idea of grabbing breakfast at Pizzafari. We weren't going to use a counter service meal for that day so it worked out. Barbara and Ben got the Bounty Platter as did Matt, only he gave away his meat. They all found it really filling and liked the french toast the best. We all agreed that the potatoes were seriously amazing. I got the Spinach and Goat Cheese Frittata and it was okay but a little on the small side and sort of dry. Not bad, but not great. The potatoes had me craving more, though. A cast member noticed Barbara's birthday button and surprised her with a cupcake! I don't care if it was only 10:30 a.m. Cupcakes are welcome anytime.
Wertham is great fun to lampoon, but the question remains: What about Batman and Robin encourages someone, anyone, to read in sex?
A6 Asocial - Rustning Är Mord
1 unchanged
Super Self-luminal saucers flying in the sky
"You are the best girl ever, ever."
A similar process has affected Amerindian farming peoples in the tropical New World, but not to the same degree. Among the Yanomamö, an agricultural people of Amazonia, 10 to 20% of all men have more than one wife at any time (Hames, 1995). They are thus more polygynous than non-tropical Amerindians but not as polygynous as tropical Africans. Their bodies likewise don’t show the same degree of robustness. Despite living in the tropics for millennia, they still look remarkably Arctic-adapted. As Holliday (1997, pp. 425-426) notes:
*Stori Rose rolled from her back to her front today! SDR was selling his plasma when it happened so he was pretty bummed that he missed it.
But is that the sort of brand recognition that Abbott Laboratories craves? And does it translate into sales? When I want/need a prescription drug for pain, my physician typically writes a scrip based on his recommendation. Lately I've refrained from asking, "Doc, my brand of choice is Vicodin" or, alternatively, "I'd like a scrip for the stuff that works so well for House." (Perhaps I need to take greater charge of my own medical destiny.)
Easy Whole Roast Chicken
Honestly, if anyone should be called out for pitchiness, it’s Philip. But the judges said nothing about it. Nada..zero. Now, I love Philip and I actually really liked this performance, particularly with the brother in law playing guitar and joining in with harmony. But he was under the note a lot…. and by the way… not for the first time. We have accepted that with him, as part of the gruff growly character of his voice…. Dylan-like. In this performance, though, it was more blatant, and I feel that if they are calling out Elise, they should have called Philip out too.
After the spacing is tweaked, I begin working the ribbon into the branches of the tree. This is where you will be very happy you have wired ribbon! You want to make it look flowy - not too contrived - but also balanced. This is not an easy task, so give yourself lots of time. And keep stepping away from the tree to see how it's coming. (You will be doing a lot of this. Count it as your workout for the day.)
'I don't know how I'm going to decide this,
Find the author online:
He told the website: ‘The bank told me that the auction had been postponed until May 7 and I told them that Nadya had filed for bankruptcy, which I think they already knew.’
Voters are due to go to the polls on Thursday May 3 to vote in the local elections and mayoral referendum in Leeds.
My friend, you would not tell with such high zest
At that point someone mentioned something about exchanging cards instead of gifts, cause some of us are short on cash, and most of us really don't want to spend that much time in the mall anyway. We had discussed doing this last year too, but we didn't really discuss it early enough for me, and I was already knitting things for two of them. And I didn't want to just exchange cards after I was already either buying or knitting things for some of them. And then I wasn't sure if I should just give the gifts I already had planned and give the others just cards. That didn't seem fair at all. So we ended up having the regular gift exchange and decided to talk about just exchanging cards the next year.
1 emphasized
He took his book and went to the solarium to read, it was part of their morning ritual. It wasn’t the same now that she was gone. He missed the way her skin felt, how soft it was. Now her skin was ashen and leathery. Now she looked like death.
Q - All non-magical light-bearing devices the character carries disappear.
Um if I am not mistaken, last time I checked Cinco De Mayo is not a national holiday here in the United States of America. If I recall it is a Mexican holiday celebrated in Mexico for their win in a war against the French. This is utter bullshit that we as American citizens have to now honor and respect other country’s holidays and embrace them as our own. I say to hell with the other country’s holidays, if you want us to respect yours, RESPECT OURS DAMN IT!
RT
“The music industry has changed tremendously over the years,” explains EVERLAST. “This album is particularly important to me to help express the current chaotic human condition we’re all dealing with. With this in mind I made the decision to take control of the situation and start my own label. Songs of the Ungrateful Living is the first album on Martyr Inc. Records in partnership with EMI. Musically and lyrically, this album reflects the diverse musical explorations and personal ebb and flow that I have experienced in recent years.”
So yes, I had to pay for both doctor visits (which will be partially refunded), and one of the vaccinations was not covered at all by the national insurance (nor was the malaria medication), but I don't even want to think about how much any of this would have cost in the States.
"I don't remember how to ride a bike," I whined like a little girl, to match my pink bike with a basket.
Because i have been monitoring her myspace, facebook, and formspring I am acutely aware of her conduct and am afraid she is not exactly the 'nice girl' I thought she was. Her swearing and threatening language were a considerable disappointment. But more than that, it was horribly sad for me. naively I want to say, "she's screaming out for her folks attention," but intellectually, I think that teenage girls are horrible monsters, each one to some degree and there is nothing I can do to protect her from herself.
In our day Jesus would have just looked in all the places where people were not the most educated, most liked and were not sort out for. He would have strolled into the places where no one would have gone. I could just imagine him strolling across the park near the rough areas with the down and outs and the uneducated people and calling them to follow him dropping everything. I think that this may have been one of the reasons why they were so quick to follow him. They had already been rejected and told they were no good but someone chose them.
Definitely bacon.
After reading them fully myself, I’ll be ready for a response in a future article. From what I know of this, the Occupy Movement is not the only portion of things. I think the author may be missing the point, but again, this is right now conjecture on my part. My response will entail more evidence.
Yes, I would still like to sit down and treat my ‘enemy’ Bloggers to a meal if the opportunity ever arises. They are still my friends even though we are on opposite sides of the political divide. Tan Sri Sanusi Junid can testify to this (he knows what I am talking about). We can do battle in the gelanggang politik (political arena), but outside ‘office hours’ why can’t we sit down and buy each other a drink and act civil towards each other?
Now, with regret, we need to sell our property and move on. The credit crunch has hit us badly and, although we have no mortgage, we have to raise some money to invest in our business to keep us going. We have put the property on the market at the very cheap price of 295,000 euros to encourage a quick sale. You will not find a comparable property at this price in the region.
Step 3: Using the pitchfork, I carefully work in a circle, prying up the bulb. Once it feels loose, I gently pull the base upward, revealing the bulb and the wild mass of roots. At this point, I will shake off the excess dirt. You may notice that your main bulb might have smaller bulbs attached. Do not separate these at this time — that task will be much easier in the spring when you replant your bulb.
You know I dream in color
It seems so obvious now. Refocus the angst inherent in the emo genre, turning it from heartbreak to, well, other things. "Sic Transit Gloria... Glory Fades" is a brooding, bass-heavy rock song lamenting the psychological tolls of sex. "I Will Play My Game Beneath The Spin Light" details the strain constant touring places on personal relationships. And because, let's face it, the scene's fans and even the bands themselves tend to be slightly narcissistic, "Okay I Believe You, But My Tommy Gun Don't" sarcastically smacks them down. Brand New still has a tendency to rely on loud power-chord driven screaming choruses that predictably jump from the verses, and a few songs don't come close to standing up to the others, most notably "The Quiet Things That No One Ever Knows," and the song titles walk the fine line between wit and verbosity masquerading as wit, but that's not exactly a point against the record, is it?
Sarah is based in Washington, and I am in London. It’s a very elegant set-up in terms of English Language representation.
And I thought, OK, now seriously, I totally HAVE to do the tie post. So I go running downstairs with my camera and the cutest belt I can find because at this point, I am completely committed to modeling the latest in tie-curtain-dress fashion, and it turns out that at some point during the last move, I THREW THEM AWAY.
"Because you wouldn't obey me and took Uriah's wife for yourself, your family will never live in peace. Someone from your own family will cause you a lot of trouble, and I will take your wives and give them to another man before your very eyes. He will go to bed with them while everyone looks on. What you did was in secret, but I will do this in the open for everyone in Israel to see."
Meaning: The praised one
Thank the person who nominated me.
FINALLY! A TTM!!! I was pretty sure the mail would slow down after the AFL, but I never imagined HOW slow it would become!!! Anyway, I big one back this week. Josh Hamilton!!! I had read that he usually waits until after the season to sign, and I can only imagine why...he probably gets a million letters and requests every season. I am glad that he took the time to ready my letter and sign my card!
But will he really survive if the happiness of the protagonists depends on him not surviving? Ushikawa keeps the novel from becoming too cut-and-dry towards its inevitable conclusion, and I felt that his sections allowed the reader to see the world of 1Q84 from the perspective of a true outsider.
Good wine, well balanced with a long finish – 89/100 points.
So I don’t need to tell you the problem is a bad one. The question — your question — is what to do about it. Actually we all know what to do about it: eat less sugary foods. The question is how to find the willpower to do this when sugar is everywhere and the emotional strains of life push us so consistently into its orbit.
First off, there is Carl Jung a quiet man who believes he and Freud should move forward in their field going so far as to help patients rise above their problems. Then, there is Freud himself (played marvelously by Viggo Mortensen) who believes their duty is to diagnose the problem, nothing more. Finally, there is Sabina a woman seemingly born with sadomasochistic desires (she enjoyed being spanked by her father at the young age of five), but because of this strives to help others in the psychoanalytical field.
I posted a similar picture on Photos by Senior Hiker a couple of days ago, but it’s still hot here on the Plateau and the subject is appropriate for Watery Wednesday, so you’re getting another picture.
Repeat offenders here will recall I’m no huge fan of wits, but anything new from Sam Adams is worth a try in my book. This one has a distinctly berry smell that is faintly like a breakfast cereal. Pours cloudy gold color with a decent white head, medium beading and medium lacing. The standard witbier spices (that I often detest) are there but they are mitigated if not complimented by the faint blackberry finish. Good stuff.
Bulgarka to respond rather oddly to one line in "You're The
So perfect you seemed carved out
Now, take 150g or so of vacuum-packed or tinned, cooked chestnuts and chop them coarsely. Add to the mushroom mixture. Then add the lentils. Then pour in 100ml of sour cream and stir well. If the mixture could do with a little more liquid, top up with any reserved stock.
Everyone safe.
The movie chronicled the activities of the children of Birmingham, Alabama in May of 1963 who decided that they were tired of being treated like second-class citizens. The Civil Rights movement, under the direction of Rev.Dr. Martin Luther King Jr, was well underway, and another organization, the Congress of Racial Equality, under the direction of James Farmer, was also making waves in the Jim Crow South.
I turned my Altima onto Pope St. pulled into the driveway and left it there for three months. I didn’t wanna drive that thing. I could already tell by the 7′s and 8′s walking along Thames that I wouldn’t want to get out of here. I walked into the second floor of that crapshack looking building to find disregarded furniture, three unkept beds and walls painted to cover plaster, holes and old green wallpaper. It was 800 for the entire summer. You get what you pay for. I walked into the small bedroom and dropped my belongings. This twin sized bed sitting atop two box crates would be mine for the next three months. In the corner of the room, left there like a wink from God himself, a pair of black panties with pink hearts and a condom wrapper like some girl wanted the rail one last time that day -hands against the wall taking every inch and angry thrust this mystery guy could give her. The mystery girl’s panties and a used condom wrapper, how fate loves to make one laugh with it’s harbingers and teasing treasures.
And the third one, my daddy's recipe for Sand Crab Chili...don't let the name scare you. There are no sand crabs in the chili...Daddy was from Pensacola, FL and felt it was just a fun name for it!
p42 “Broadly speaking, the entire life of the ordinary man is nothing but a makyo.”
Because @ is the first character there, only people who follow both me and @mypretenddog will see that on their home pages. If I start with any other character, all my followers can see it:
of what life throws their way. Using cosmetics and specialty
This will be my fourth year teaching. I taught half-time, half-day Kindergarten in Washington, taught 1st grade my first year in Alaska, and Kindergarten last year (after 5 days with my firsties) and am teaching Kindergarten again this year.
Me: Would you go to a stable with me? If I suddenly became obsessed with horses? Even if we had to get up at eight in the morning and drag the kids? Even if it was the last thing you wanted to do?
They definitely think when you move to San Francisco you basically start liking people of the same sex, turn into a Democrat and a Vegan and try to “bring down America”. Really, you just eat a lot of cioppino and sourdough, complain about how cold it is and marvel at the sheer amount of coffee shops that aren’t Starbucks. It’s a great town. Nothing to be a afraid of.
The writers are throwing weird plots and stereotypes at the viewer as if they were on sale.
There seemed to be a ray of hope yesterday when comedian Ian Fox told me Tesco cash dispensers in Manchester issue £5 notes and journalist Jay Richardson told me you can get £5 from machines in Glasgow. But, last night, I tried Tesco cash machines in SE London (Lewisham) and NW London/Hertfordshire (Borehamwood). Nope. They don’t dispense £5 notes. Nor do Sainsbury machines in Greenwich (SE London) or London Colney (NW London).
My afternoon drive home these days ends in twilight and during my solitary morning run, I can feel the chill in the air and the dance of the first fallen foliage around my feet, when the breeze picks up.
Sesame Calamari
Oh dear a valid argument. So a plan needs to be made. Her car has no petrol so she will have to hitch into town. She has done this many times before, but never at this time of day. Walks briskly down the road towards the end of the village where all the hikers stand. But a mere block from her house she hears a car coming behind her and sticks out her thumb and voila she has a lift to town.
It is watching a child struggle to pick up his or her head, sit,
So when a fellow blogger offers you a little help up the ladder along the way you jump at the chance. Don’t you? If this sounds like you–read on. Thank you fellow blogger Hart Johnson–aka Watery Tart (Confessions of) for this headsup.
“I bought you a dress for the formal want to see.”
I didn't pick out the other parts of the kitchen, but picture a mammoth stainless undermount sink with a curved chrome faucet. I'll keep my black stove because it was a gift and thus is very special to me. Plus I think the black would fade into the background instead of competing for spotlight with the floor the way stainless would. I would replace my fridge and dishwasher with updated versions, also in black. A bamboo Roman shade on the window that's a lighter and more golden than the cabinets. And a few more pieces of Le Crueset in flame to add to what I have to jazz things up even more. Because, you know, I'm all about a jazzy kitchen.
I’m sorry to say so but, sadly, it’s true that Bang-ups and Hang-ups can happen to you.
Note the final sentence: "It is an important part of the Jamaica Bay estuary system".
41 Animal Farm – George Orwell
Just as He holds me
My husband and I have a little joke going that if I ever left him, it would be for a jar of tahini. Sad, but (nearly) true. Luckily my marriage allows me to enjoy the best of both worlds – my main man and my tahini boyfriend on the side. I am sure I’ve canonized the stuff quite enough here on the blog, but since I’ve never delved into details about tahini, I think this opportunity is a perfect one.
I don't really use this to remove my eye make up with as I'll normally use either my Cleanse & Polish or some make up wipes but I love using this as an alternative to my Eyebright. It's very cooling and refreshing and sometimes my eyes do get tired and red. This soothes the skin down and makes them look wide awake. It's a cheaper alternative to the Eyebright.
Similar protests were announced across dozens of US localities and in countries ranging from Spain to Australia.
630 D-VII/29/1972. “Discipline and Liberation: On Euripides’ Medea.” Barat College Conference, Lake Forest, Illinois.
Cost so far: 3609 gold + 2175 Justice Points + 12000 Honor Points
The Anti-Apartheid Movement: Most Successful Stalinist Popular Front
Marvel has revealed a new "Spiderman" that is half Black and half Hispanic. He can still climb buildings but now he leaves behind graffiti. (Racist? I'd say so)
Saturday morning came and we were in no rush to get to Atlanta so we took our sweet time. For some reason in my mind, I didn't think it would be too crowded. In my strange mind because it was Dec 11 and the train had been there since Oct 29, everyone else had probably gone already. We got there at 11:00, bought our tickets (we decided to get the double ride) and waited in line for TWO HOURS. The last time I waited in line for something for two hours, I was a teenager at Six Flags. This time was a tad different because we had a TWO YEAR OLD WITH US! It was a battle to keep her happy but between the two of us, we kept her pretty content. We let her run around a little. Play on our phones a little. She did very well considering.
This will be the third year of this course offering at WKU, which won the 2010 “Creativity and Innovation Award” from the North American Association for Summer Programs.
Erster Po Boy. As we were here during late August, the oysters weren’t at their prime and I thought they were deep fried a bit too much. Essentially a fried shell that tasted a little funky. We should have gone for the shrimp, apparently.
And then the strangest thing of all happened, and has been happening ever since!
I realized I've never shared our laundry room with you, mainly because there's not much to it- it's a small space with just enough room for the washer, dryer, overhead cabinets, and a nice granite sink. I hadn't done anything to make it pretty since moving in and decided this weekend to fix it up. I shopped the house to find a Home Goods mirror ($20), an old potted orchid (Pier One), and some scripture wall plaques that my best friend gave me years ago.
I'm sure that if you have been hopping along - you have seen a number of Sweet 'n Sassy's very cute images. I also have a Label down the left side of my blog that says "By: Sweet 'n Sassy". If you click on that you will see all the other cards that I have made.
Dearest Jacob,
In order to determine if the tumor is benign or cancerous, surgery is necessary. If the tumor appears to be small from the imaging tests, then a procedure known as laparoscopy may be used.
"These people can't even wrap up genocide," Coulter writes. "We've been hearing about this slaughter in Darfur forever -- and they still haven't finished.
As I looked around because I couldn’t help laughing, I realized that those around me were laughing, too. It was a great start to my weekend!
At the very least, I believe there is Real Presence, which should always be respected.
"I dreamt we got more pets."
In my intermittent quest to catch up with books, specifically interesting series books, that have been sitting on the to read stack for more than a year, I picked up: Adrian Tchaikovsky’s, Dragonfly Falling a couple of weeks ago. The result of this particular ‘quest’ in the form of my review can be read below:
At last, Your Treasure is our own.
7 don
I've been lusting over this brand for quite some time because of their creativity and controversial designs. It really brings out the street fashion of Los Angeles with a sense of punk and electro.
In terms of the web design I give Rhapsody the prize for finding albums, but Rdio the gold ring for social networking.
Hell, who knows – maybe we’ll even have actual waking sex this weekend.
One thing that hasn’t been here at the farm is much in the way of rain. That, and a dearth of snow this year, means the ground is a lot dryer than normal. We’ve done some improvement to the soil – lime in the fall and manure in the spring. But the grass isn’t growing very quickly yet up here or anywhere in our neighborhood up here on the hill.
But you want to have relationships online with many more. So how are you going to do that?
i chose to create my version using the new tapes i received. these are so beautiful, have beautiful patterns and adhere beautifully to a piece of cardstock.
last day of community CSA share
This month I have shared quite a bit of breastfeeding information and opinions from breastfeeding experts or moms with experience. I'd like to share a story from a mom-to-be that is planning to breastfeed. Jennifer formula-fed her first daughter, but is now looking forward to trying breastfeeding with her bundle-to-be. Her goal is to breastfeed exclusively for the first 6 months.
Len called her a midwife – she keeps delivering week after week. Bruno said the marriage between Brazil and Funkytown has never been more exhilarating. Carrie Ann called it amazing.
I just adore this white & black butterfly poster by Eva Juliet, and I am seriously thinking it would be a great piece to have on the wall in our bedroom. It would be pretty, hung low and just behind my bedside lamp, by my table... What do you think?
Tomorrow (rather today if you wish since it's after midnight) is the first day of the rest of our lives. Day one on our road to help F. Her treatment plan or "prevention" plan as you will since there really isn't a treatment, starts at 3:00pm. Beginning with day one of intensive therapy. I'm not sure I'm mentally prepared. I'm nervous, will she be scared? Will she be in pain? Will she hurt tomorrow night after this all? I don't know what to Expect and we get to do this 3 times a week indefinitely. That's not including everything else we have to squeeze in for her all week. Every week.
Sunday is Mother's Day. I want to take this opportunity to say "Happy Mother's Day" to all the mothers. My children and my hubby always make that day very special for me. I am looking forward to it.
So this begs the question. This damaged man with a willing heart and a lighter outlook, where does he go? Where would he like to journey to? Somewhere outside of Arizona? Maybe the PNW? I don’t know, neither does he. But considering all the horrendous torture I’ve put myself through in my life, and the anguish that inflicted me after my divorce, I feel like anything is possible.
Acute in parallel
Dies: Star Border, Out of This World st/3, Limitless Layers Ovals
I like this beer. It is what it purports to be--and nothing else. Crisp and light, it has a little bit of a sweetness to it that I wish it didn't have, but otherwise this is a nice and easy-drinking beer.
So my hope for the next fest is a little less Bourbon and a more lower strength winter warmers. So far the beer I have liked most recently was a fresh Winter Solstice from Anderson Valley - such a lovely and subtle beer with just the right hint of spice. I hope local brewers will back of the big-is-better kick and start to rediscover, once again, the subtle, drinkable winter beer.
Everyone's heard I&P enough, and probably actually enjoyed it more times than they care to admit- But we don't need to hear it again anytime soon, do we..?. Here's what the kids also got in 1967 when they bought it. The Strange, yet catchy, "Birdman Of Alkatrash." It is what it is, but it's actually kind of a fun song, but i'm biased because i actually dig this hippy trippy goof ball psychedelic crap. I think it's a real hoot.
That's where we wanna go
When I set out to compile my list I thought first of fantasy and second of adventure so most of my picks are more fantasy with elements of adventure. After all, it is one of the easiest lines to blur. So enough foreplay already. What are your top ten? OK. Settle down. Here they are in chronological order. Check back in at the end of the week for the Chronicle staff’s tally of their top picks in this exciting genre.
In reality, he could care less, all he wanted to eat is
C: Fundamentalists are to Catholics as California drivers are to Montanans. Yes, that is my name. My name is C. As for “f**king moron,” that’s not D’s name.
Given Wolstencroft’s track record for challenging cinema, it’s not surprising he’s a one-man production machine, directing MUFF later in the year and participating in numerous film projects. “I’m making my new film The Second Coming, which is an adaption of a poem by William Butler Yates, and…I’ve got my new film The Beautiful and the Damned…that’ll be coming out later in the year on DVD.”
Monday: Polenta with Spaghetti Sauce, Baby Green Salad
I take writing materials with me when I travel because I often don't bring my computer. I have a collection of old marbled-cover composition books, the kind with the pages all sewn in and the space on the front to write the subject of the class you're using it for. Some of them have lines, but my favorite are the unruled, with just blank pages. They're all leftovers from school, but I hate wasting stuff like that, so I flip forward to the blank pages at the end, wherever I'd left off the last time I was note-taking or doodling or jotting something. I used to carry a tiny little Moleskine, but it was too small and I went through the pages too fast -- convenient for throwing into a bag, but inconvenient for actually writing or sketching or doodling on! Do you write or type? Type, type, type. I can't write fast enough to keep up with the words in my head. I'm a very fast typer, and I vastly prefer to type. When I write by hand, my hand and arm cramp up and I lose my next thought in the time it takes me to finish jotting down the first one. I have erratic illegible handwriting and I switch randomly between print and cursive, sometimes word by word or between letters. I'm also an obsessive-compulsive saver -- I click save every paragraph or so when I'm typing, but there's no save on a notebook and I have no outlet for that tic. Once I drew a save button at the top of a page and tapped it with my pen while I was thinking. Probably not something I should share with the public at large. Plus, I worry about how easy it is to lose a notebook with hours of work in it, while I back up all my electronic files on the cloud so even if my computer crashes I can access them anywhere. But I do write longhand when I travel or I'm away from my computer, and it is a good challenge, mentally, to both overcome my tics, and to keep my thoughts organized and flowing even with the slower rate. Oh, and it definitely helps with word economy.
We got to see some incredible acrobats from China. I held my breath nearly the whole time because I truly couldn't believe what I was seeing. Here are some of the crazy antics. (I'm translating from Chinese.)
Democratic strategist Hilary Rosen stepped in it last week when she said Ann Romney had not “worked a day in her life.”
Again, he sat there very thoughtfully and asked, "Why couldn't she keep me?" Wow, how do you answer that question? So I told him, "I'm not sure buddy, because she was in China and I was in America, so we never met. But I am sure that she loved you, and she wanted to make sure that you came to live with us."
16. Anita Morris (Nine)
What's the scene like in New York and more generally throughout the U.S.? Any cool bands you think people should check out?
You may be asking - how do I do that? How do I make those decisions? Here is a list of questions I ask myself when decluttering. They help me choose quickly and decisively
Non-traditional outlets:
D1 Evening Star
Ever since I started wearing it last June I have literally worn it every day since. Even though it's comfortable in comparison to the other binders I have, if worn for longer than 6 hours it will start to cause acid reflux and my shoulders/upper-back start to really ache. After longer than 10 hours, I will literally start to feel sick - so I started to wear it in classes and then, while wearing a baggy jacket, will switch to the T-Kingdom M801 for a chest break'ish.
It’s a good thing he went. We have the conversation that perplexes people who resist God and do the theological and logical ducking and diving. They talk about the Christians as the “born agains” as if that were a weird cult or strange aberration!
The Quality Of Recovery
Of course, the districts will rarely blame themselves at all. Certainly, there are hundreds of factors that contribute to poor public schools, ranging from economic conditions of the local families and general parental involvement to the fact that inner cities have seen a steady decline in the local tax base that funds significant portions of their school operating budgets. But the schools themselves are run very poorly: teachers rewarded for surviving instead of succeeding, poor teacher mentorship programs, lack of curriculum restructure to reflect the fact that most learning occurs outside the classroom, poor leadership from districts and principals, and unhelpful teacher and employee unions that resist accountability. Add to that a lack of a clear goal for why we even have a public education system (after all, mandatory public education is a relatively new construct) – is it for the good of the student, the good of the country, or the convenience of the parent? And then throw a diverse student and teacher mix on top of all that. It is no wonder that our schools are suffering.
I shake my head. “I know, those local kids are right bastards. If you think that you know who it is, I'll have a little word in their ear.”
Coat cake with a small layer of ganache. Place "stumps" on top. Continue coating with ganache and using a fork, create a bark effect.
Paul 'Kipper' Dickson - lead vocals, Hugh 'Bamber' McIlfatrick - guitar/vocals, Chris 'Cree' Tweed - guitar/vocals, John Henry - bass, Willis Beckett - drums.
I haven’t posted for a few days now – just life has a nasty habit of sneaking up and getting in your way – but things are beginning to feel like they are back on track again so I need to try and get back with the programme!
published by Woman’s Weekly, mostly crime. No, I don’t have that number etched on my brain – it’s just that last year a great opportunity arose to sell some of these serials on and it was in my interest to make a tally of them.
Our country needs to re-think the whole idea of "liberal arts education," if an honor student can't get a degree without a rigorous and completely irrelevant science class.
Anyhow, the statements:
I would have never sought to not only make my sermons cogent, intelligent and convincing, but beautiful, if not for the sermons and prayers of my grandfather and Reverend Nant Nan. Never would I come to value the power of turning frank, honest, and mundane stories of daily life into spirit-filled stories of God as found in the writing of Frederick Buechner and Anne Lamott if not for Max Blalock and Mary Bendall, who introduced me to these now great friends through their own preaching. From Deb Welsh I’ve seen in action the grace delivered with a well-told story. There’s a great chance that I’d never know the power and grace of a well-timed and well-placed pop culture reference if not for Matt Smith. Bishop Will Willimon teaches me the value of comedic timing in preaching. And perhaps most importantly, from my mother comes the always-echoing refrain of, “Tell them about Jesus, Johnny.”
In other related news, I’m painting up a solid 15pts Asphyxious list to start my crawl into the underworld, and another 15pts Circle Orboros list with zero, and I do mean ZERO official PP models. Stay tuned!
Here are some pictures: (I blocked out the faces because I am pretty sure my husband would not be happy about revealing his identity in a big rooster costume).
To understand the Life and Death of Jesus Christ requires a heart that truly has seen that the things of this world truly do not have any meaning in this “whole scheme of life”. Valuing what is UNSEEN requires a soul that is fully in tune with the God that created it. And that is exactly what Jesus Christ demonstrated on the Cross, at Calvary. There is no human logic on this earth that can reason out how THIS ULTIMATE ACT of UNCONDITIONAL LOVE could be done. (Which also demonstrates that UNCONDITIONAL LOVE, itself, is derived from Divinity.) Such a soul is not bound by the ways of this world, it is bound by the spiritual code that God guides them with…which is beyond the world ways. This soul, yearns, and only feels complete by following God’s Ways. And this can only be achieved by firmly knowing what to believe in.
i enjoy college. i enjoy the whole rush of getting ready in the morning, and then rushing to get out of the house, and rushing to get to college in time. i enjoy, on the rare occasions of arriving early, bumping into the randomest of friends and sitting down for gossips and updates and coffee. i like walking around and seeing friends everywhere that i don’t actually feel the need to avoid. i like the lessons. i like the fact that nobody around me talks about exams all the time, or worry about grades, or always seem to be reading educational materials. i like the fact that we can talk about clothes and take retarded pictures in class .. and next moment, start discussing karl marx theories and pros and cons of capitalism vs. communism.
I agreed with the first point. I have flat arches. Period. No amount of running & walking & Crossfitting in my Vibrams or Nike Frees are going to change that – believe me, I’ve TRIED and TRIED and TRIED. It’s just not in my anatomy. Without arch support, my foot caves inward & sets of a whole chain of badness from my arch all the way up to my hips. It’s not worth it, especially when all I have to do is plunk down $40-something for a pair of green Superfeet insoles.
I've always felt as though we should err on the side of preparing rather than protecting young people when it comes to life's challenges, especially when experienced in the pages of a book.
Event Deadline: 30 November 2011
& wait as bad calls
03 May 2011:A student burned his diploma outside the college in protest at lack of support and work opportunities
1/8 cup of potato starch
I didn't realize I had the number of exposures set for “16” rather than “12”, and I ended up with this funky overlapping on all of my images.
O’Reilly then pointed out that if Fox News’ Carl Cameron said the same thing about reporting on Obama, there would be an outcry from the liberal press, which even Quinn agreed with:
Always use updated anti-malware protection. Despite growing awareness of today’s Web-borne threats, many people still don’t use even a basic anti-virus solution and leave themselves vulnerable to infections, data loss and identity theft. You can download Panda Security’s award-winning Panda Cloud Antivirus software, which is completely free, here.
Where dinners are loud and full of laughter.
Underneath the crown is a 3-tiered topknot hairpiece; an identical wig is worn by the Tibetan monks when they perform certain lama dances depicting the Dakinis. Then the crown is tied on with black threads in three different places.
Some say it is lust
Until the last few sips, I was ok. But as I tilted the glass to my lips, I spotted a thick chunk of yeast at the bottom of the glass. I got the sip down, but my mind decided that the beer had become nasty. A couple of dry heaves later, the last half glass of La Bestia went into the sink, and I went off in search of something filtered.
Geekydaddy feels this difference in lifestyle acutely, and though we didn't speak of it directly, I tacitly gave him the weekend "off" kid duty by agreeing to him playing bartender. Once he knew that the house had a poolside bar he procured his mixology supplies and spent a good part of each day muddling up delicious beverages. To his credit he did spend the rest of the time playing with the kids in the pool. I knew this division of labor would leave me as the one to make sure the children were not dehydrated, hungry, overtired, over-televisioned or burning in the sun.
And then I won’t want to hit my personal “Self-Destruct” button anymore.
I go with comfort food.
There are different safety mechanisms that each country can implement, continues Kenett, citing Greece's financial problems and their impact on the European market as a whole. "Germany is so invested in Greece that they don't have an option other than to bail Greece out," he says, noting that if it had been able to see the extent of their dangerous connection with Greece, Germany could have opted to reduce its investments earlier.
GALICIA-GARCIA MD, GONZALEZ-TORGA A, GARCIA-GONZALEZ C, FUSTER-PEREZ M, GARRIGOS-GORDO I, LOPEZ-FRESNENA N, GRACIA-RODRIQUEZ RM, SANCHEZ-PAYA J. Vacunación de gripe en trabajadores sanitarios. Por qué se vacunan y por qué no se vacunan. (Influenza vaccination in healthcare workers. Why are some vaccinated whereas others are not?) Enferm Infect Microbiol Clin 2006; 24: 413-417.
I pressed Uloma for details then…I asked her how her parents reacted to the event of that night and she had coolly told me that it was “okay”. Her father had given her money to run some tests but declined her suggestion to take the matter to the police. He wanted the matter “contained”…a family affair.
He is an utter delight.
Jami: As soon as it happened. It was a really rough time for me, and I needed people to know. I tried to go on like everything was okay, but it was hard. People respond in different ways to miscarriage. Some see it as no big deal... like, "Oh, well". But others acknowledge it and are kind. Many just don't know or understand what it's like. It's a death. I have a friend who miscarried after I did... she told me she wishes she'd been more compassionate to me and admitted she just didn't understand until she went through it herself.
Cindy and Mishelle
were no angels watching
I am married to a wonderful woman named Abigail Ayres, we have been married for two years, and have been enjoying life. We met in Jackson Hole Wyoming, while working as river guides on the Snake River.There are currently no children in the picture, but hopefully they will come within the next couple years.
He was replaced with Molly, a cocker spaniel who would snarl and growl if you got too close. She went nearly as soon as she came. Miko came next, the poor black and white shih-tzu with an overbite; she was dumb as a bag of rocks. But she was sweet and I bawled my eyes out when we finally had to put her down 17 years later when I was a grown adult. Before she died, we got Maddie, the most precious puppy I had ever seen. She was a Wheaten Terrier, and eventually became frightened of almost everything, everyone, and everywhere. We put her on doggie Xanax, and that helped a bit. She was my dad’s best friend. Truly. We didn’t think we could ever replace her. Darby though, was leaps and bounds better than Maddie personality-wise. She was the best, and out of the blue, as a very young dog, got sick and died in my parents arms.
“Choice Publishing offer a choice of publishing packages:
You may find that you are in a relationship that you like and you live in fear of discovery---or you decide that you should tell the truth.
Coronation Street: Alison King (Carla Connor)
I’ve followed W. Chaser for quite some time now and its exciting to watch as he gets ready to launch his first novel. Recently, his informative posts about formatting a novel to fit e-book parameters have all made my list of bookmarks for future reference.
The recent Art of Fiction post about the loss of the Manchester Dutch Pancake House reminds me of one of my more depressing writing experiences.
Be prepared for what ever you say to be misunderstood, twisted and interpreted in a different way to what it was meant, either accidentally or deliberately to suit the bp’s emotions at the time.
The wait was definitively worth it. I almost immediately tried the E2 and I smoked a few more since. This is certainly a different Partagas. It is a fat cigar, being a 54 ring gage x 5.5" (140mm long), same size as the Romeo & Julieta Limited Edition Duke from 2009. More interestingly, it is not a usual Partagas.
It is not within my 'right' to judge another PERSON. I CANNOT know exactly 'who' that person really is, except based on my own 'mirror' image, right? I have not lived any life but my own.
“4.5 stars! Director Craig Allen Mummey lovingly directs an exceptional cast, and everyone shines… a youthful and sensitive Rebecca Ellis, an uninhibited Alyssa Sanders, a charming Doug Krehbel… Laura Russell’s sweet, shy Agnes provides the only maternal streak evident among the sisters, and Stephanie Mumford gives a lighthearted portrayal filled with uninhibited dancing.
moist with melted snow and winter rain?
Doors open at 18.00 and show starts at 20.00. Pick-up for purchased tickets will be at Harpa - Reykjavík Concert Hall.
Bush has always loved to make an unusual voice even
I love the crystal heart in the center, and I love it even more that my Mom made it for me, as a surprise. I also had a second garter to toss, which was a story itself. I bought a tacky NCSU adorned garter way before the wedding, forgot about it, then remembered the day of that I didn't have a garter to toss. My aunt stitched up a garter that afternoon with a red ribbon to toss instead. This one however is in Stephen's safekeeping!
It was very dark and cold. I decided to accept her offer to stay with her for the night. We had an early dinner in silence and then in the emptiness of my room she rose from the mists of my memory, Beautiful, charming, and so youthful, her laughter ringing in my ears like a thousand unheard melodies.
1) January Moms-two of them in particular- Tabitha and Lisa who jumped in and gave us money towards Stephanie's prom. Her ticket is PAID for. My heart is smiling, because my baby gets to go be a princess for a night because people have huge hearts.
Applying the same principles as set out above, Norris J considered that Perini’s lost chance of sale in respect of the Georgia-Pacific line was 25% on a speculative sale price of 2.157 million Euros.
It’s just a phase. They have to sleep eventually.
All people on earth accept that
I think so many of my brothers and sisters in Christ are living out there in oppression, and it’s because they don’t know that they are or they don’t ask for help from the Lord to be free or they aren’t persistent.
I mentioned to her about Oprah's Book Club and how books become successful. "Mom, you should send your book to Oprah." Of course, that's easy enough. (Pop goes my balloon!)
Last Tuesday afternoon I went out to get the mail after dragging my sorry butt out of bed. It was the usual collection of bills, sale papers, and assorted junk mail but there was one exception. It was a small, obviously computer printed postcard addressed only to the resident of my house. It had no return address and on initial inspection I almost threw it away on sheer instinct, that is until I glanced at what was written on the back.
Zombies Time of the season UK
And never getting a chance
While rewriting the book, I considered getting rid of the prologue but I kept it for three reasons: I wanted readers to experience for themselves the events that precipitated the story, it was the way I originally conceived it, and I loved the image of tiny footprints in the snow. The prologue might seem like a darling, a word used by William Faulkner to describe the parts we love but that have no real function in the story, and maybe it is. But Light Bringer is my work, my creation, and until I find a publisher, I can do whatever I want with it.
So much support and love across the miles came my way when I blogged my feelings through my fathers illness and ultimate death. During my knee and gall bladder surgeries I was overwhelmed by your concerns and good wishes.
Knowing myself pretty well, however, I predict that dieting will be a non-starter and will be replaced by the simple expedient of never again standing sideways on to a camera.
By the time I was finished, it was after 1:00 AM, and I was drained both physically and emotionally. I set up another litter box (fortunately there was an extra in the garage) with a water dish and deposited Van Gogh in the guest bedroom.
This weeks sponsor is our own Donna giving away two wonderful digi sets of your choice. And here comes the inspirational cards made by my so far very little team, but we do rock, don't we?
Show empathy. Often you will need to cover sensitive or distressing topics. Show some compassion for the subject without getting too emotional. Ask for permission before asking difficult questions, e.g. “Is it okay to talk about…?”
He’s been to the front door and back to the bedroom a dozen times already. Looking in the closet and pulling back the comforter. Breaking my heart with every “no daddy”.
How can my words offend you? They weren’t even words!
Emu Oil – From flightless ratite birds native to Australia and now factory farmed. Used in cosmetics and creams. Alternatives: vegetable and plant oils.
400g caster sugar
So I just noticed that there's no email address or way to contact me other than writing a comment or searching for my facebook page so I've added an email link. In the headed, "Email Me" is a link so you can send questions or whatever. I've also added on the right side, an easier way to follow me. You can now follow my email instead of having to create a blogger account or whatever that nonsense was. Hope this makes life easier! (first world problems)
Stepping inside the Salisbury Cathedral a neat little woman in a green sash honed in on me with a smile. "Would you like a leaflet? It's a little map with a suggested route. In-" her smile faltered. "English? Or...something...else?"
* I'm contemplating a trip to see my youngest sister in the fall. She lives in Washington. I only saw her at Christmas last year. This makes me sad. So the thought of a trip to see her intrigues me. I'm thinking of taking the train....trying something different. I'm thinking my mom and other sister should come along. I had a crazy weird dream about traveling in the train to see my sister last night.....must mean it is on my mind?
I feel… Guess? Yeah, I feel scared of going public and people recognising it is me who writes. It feels much more safe being only @gati_presumida or @TuLupus…
Yep, that describes me very well! I was hoping to go for one last girly day shopping today with a friend, but I had to cancel due to the cramp-like pain that I keep getting in my left thigh. It's very strange, very painful and comes at completely random moments when I'm either standing or walking and there is nothing to do but sit down quick, or else stand with legs clamped together to try to ease the pain!! Neither of which is very easy to do when out and about anywhere public!! It took me a long time to walk to the washing line yesterday as I had to keep stopping with the pains and take mouse-size steps with my legs crossed, like someone busting for the loo! So, here I am, slumped in front of the computer and having a bit of a whinge!! I expect the baby is pressing on a nerve somewhere, although I haven't had this with any of my other pregnancies. Each night I wonder if 'tonight will be the night' and I got all excited when I saw the full moon last night, but I'm still here!!
Two Tshwane Metro Council employees were asked to leave the Cabana Pub and Restaurant shortly after sitting down because "no blacks are allowed" in the restaurant.
I ‘met’ this guy on Match. I wasn’t really that interested in him. I was more or less bored, and he didn’t look like the worst option out there, so I agreed to go out with him.
Pasta with Sausage and Kale
One of my residents is dying.
If I asked you to describe South Park in three words and all three words are synonymous with disgusting, I know exactly how you feel. I spent years trying to understand why all of my friends were so obsessed with such a disgusting show. The problem with that statement is that though the show can be gross and raunchy, it is consistently brilliant. The show is littered with statements about society and humanity, attacking anything and everything. Ripe with parodies, nothing is safe when it comes to South Park creators Matt Stone and Trey Parker. Every boundary has been or will be pushed. What some people don’t seem to understand, something I didn’t understand, is that South Park is not gross just to be gross (most of the time at least). The majority of their episodes and jokes are crafted to make a point. This truth permeates the basic plotlines and main characters of each episode and bleeds to all aspects of the show. Side characters, side plots, environments and backgrounds all weave together to help the writers make their point. The depths of the shows intelligence is unlimited and I will go on record in saying that for years now it has been one of the smartest, most poignant shows on television.
May 29, 2009. Hilda Fourie of Beeld newspaper reports from their Pretoria office that an 80-year-old woman on Thursday found the body of her murdered stepson in front of his smallholding garage in Mnandi, Centurion.
Lainey: "Cats have tails."
The conversation went something like this:
I think every equestrian makes the same pained face when they hear the phrase “no stirrups work.” It doesn’t matter what their discipline is, how long they’ve been riding, or their age. What’s more, nearly every rider I’ve ever spoken to will say without prompting that riding without stirrups has improved their seat, balance, and leg control when they receive the award of taking their stirrups back.
Tears are a language God understands.
If you plan on doing a bit of diy, get yourself a pack of straight pins. They're cheap and very worth it. Safety pins, though I love them, are no substitute. Get the longer ones; they stay in the fabric better. Plus, you can use the straight pins to pin your fabric into your carpet or corkboard, which may come in handy for you later.
It is estimated that every year 150,000 Jews leave the fold to marry out. 3500 years of Judaism cannot combat a ham sandwich or a McDonald cheeseburger. Why?
Now its turned upside down, and I’m sure its all my fault.
I also made Eggless Chocolate Chip Cookie Dough Balls. I guest posted about them here. They are so good made with Coconut Oil! I also loved them dipped in dark chocolate!
– Cooperstown Collection Throwback Series
The tracks grew sparse—just a few tire tracks and joggers’ treads, along with lots of her own shoe prints—and twenty minutes later, she’d left civilization behind. No people. No cars. She blew out a breath to clean her lungs of city air, then drew in a fresh breath. Just as she started to relax, she caught a glimpse of a black car parked perhaps a tenth of a mile down a side pate. A city car. Usually the only people who ventured so far off the road were those driving sports or recreational vehicles, like SUVs or ATVs.
﻿﻿﻿The International Festival of Authors in Toronto was so fun! It was an honour to be invited and I was thrilled to hang out with so many amazing writers! The picture above was taken after I participated in a round table event with Nicole Lundrigan, Miriam Toews and Marina Endicott, moderated by Susan G. Cole. (Photo by Hilary McMahon, my agent, thanks Hilary!)
(Anne Rice's INTERVIEW WITH A VAMPIRE might be the one exception. But even at closer look, you can see that Rice didn't fall into that trap. Even though that novel is basically one long conversation, the vampire narrates scenes as if they were actually happening so there is sense of immediacy, action, and event plotting to carry the novel.)
Although I could do with a few less "Solid Gold" dance steps, but I guess that's the point, eh.
Wine: 2006 Chardonnay, Forrest Estate, Marlborough
My receipts label from the eighteen 25 printable for one sleeve of the folder,
I was sucking red wine out of the bottle at 10:30 on Mother's Day morning....I"ll save the full story for another day.
Say you have left your old town behind to start a new chapter in your life – college. Nobody from your hometown came with you, and you’re stuck with having to make new friends. Don’t worry, though, it’s easier than you think.
I have never given this topic a thought that who would be my favourite character in Harry Potter books besides Harry himself. Let me see what will be the result by the end of this post. I am excluding Harry here because he seems to be the favourite by default and it would be difficult to compare and select somebody else if he is also in the competition.
Darcy Edwards
What should we call G+casting in the stream? Comment below or chew the news fat with me in one of U_News’ regular on-air Hangouts at 11:00 am CST or 3:30 pm CST M-F. Or, chime in on one of our impromptu recorded discussions about the day’s news.www.gplus.to/komusarah . You can watch U_News live here. www.komu.com/streaming-newscast
Could she have done anything differently?
-Mitchell Parish
André LeBel, CEO, SOCAN (Canada)
It's that time of month again, so welcome to the Digicats Station on the January Rain "Prince Charming" blog train.
1 CUP OF FLOUR
Welly:" Hi Mom"
Me: "Well how do you pay for your gas?"
A recipe with a max of 3 ingredients can't be hard, right?
...The scheme carried out by the company defrauded government agencies and private developers of about $19 million, much of it tax money, Ms. Lynch said at a news conference. She was joined by officials from several other agencies to announce a deferred-prosecution agreement.
The last one I'm going to post for today was done with a simple airbrushed background--I only used one color (B14) because I really wanted the background to be subtle so that the elements would really pop.
The food thing is proving tricky though. I’m ridiculously hungry and getting frustrated about not losing any weight yet. Yes, I know it’s early days, but I’ve read the stories in magazines about women who have tried this diet plan or that slimming group, where they say: “I was so amazed when I lost 6lb in the first week! It was so easy!”
Ahhh so I'm now 27. It's just great, I'm so not worried about being older. Yet. There's more time for that later. I'm too busy feeling pretty great about where I am now (something I rarely do, and should do more!).
You can also follow the @BattleshipMovie Twitter feed for more coverage from the big event.
Wood County (April 2012) — Do you have an old car seat taking up space in your garage or basement? Safe Kids Wisconsin is providing a way for parents to drop off old car seats, free of charge, Saturday, April 28, across the state.
- Hey Tom, just need the loo?
I first came across this garden when I interviewed the owner, the renowned Australian interior designer Stuart Rattle, for the Sydney Morning Herald and Age newspaper's Sunday magazine. It was for story on city professionals who had moved to the countryside. He told me that when he first set eyes on the old dilapidated school house that would later become his home (above), it gave him something of an architectural shock. "I was expecting Howard's End," he confessed with a laugh, "but this looked like the World's End". But then he returned at twilight and in that shimmering golden light, the old house made his heart skip a beat. "I no longer saw the reality," he said, "but the fantasy."
4. With affiliate marketing you’ll probably want to sell many products at the same time to make the kind of money you want to make. Don’t try to start off this way though, learn how to do it by starting with one product. Once you’re making money add another product and keep adding until your income is at the level you want.
Every vehicle containing someone who looks like they might be a member of the religion of peace and a backpack.
Water, 3 bowls
Jermaine has been back in town, housed at the halfway house, since November 29th.
The seriousness of this matter of culture cannot be overstated. The vituperative attacks on secular culture that emanate from Afro-Caribbean Christianity in the UK are utterly reprehensible in light of the sheer rampant materialism that bedevils many black people inside and outside the Church and the wanton lasciviousness that takes place behind closed doors. It is one thing to be a hypocrite, but quite another to hector others loudly when you are less than clean in your own spiritual life before God. Even in writing this a post such as this, I am keenly aware of the areas in which I remain a work in progress. However, God has called some of us to speak up and speak out, and so I write this not in my own strength, but also knowing that I am not who I used to be and I am on a journey to becoming more than I am at this moment. Culture is one of the areas in which Bible-believing Christians are further down the road than ever before, but still no-where near where we are supposed to be.
“Here we are. Terminal three.”
This is the first post of my “State of the Race” series on competitive races in the state of Michigan. I am starting very purposefully with a race very close to my heart: Michigan’s First District. The “fightin’ first” as Stephen Colbert would say, is the largest district East of the Mississippi river, as seen below.
For those of you dedicated to surfing the web with Firefox, fear not because you have quite a powerful anti-time-wasting addon at your disposal. In fact, I would say LeechBlock gives you more options in terms of customizing which sites you want to block when.
Always be polite and professional. Do not demand anything from the publisher, such as “I wish to hear from you no later than May 1st or I will find it necessary to look for another publisher.” Instead, simply end the letter by stating, “Thank you for your consideration. If you require any additional information, please let me know. I look forward to hearing from you.” You will have your contact information on the letter-mailing address, email address, phone number-if the publisher feels the need to contact you.
Small families is the rule today. Husbands and wives refuse to take upon themselves the responsibilities of family life. Many of them do not care to be bothered with children. Yet this commandment given to Adam has never been abrogated or set aside. If we refuse to live by the covenants we make, especially in the house of the Lord, then we cannot receive the blessings of those covenants in eternity. If the responsibilities of parenthood are willfully avoided here, then how can the Lord bestow upon the guilty the blessings of eternal increase? It cannot be, and they shall be denied such blessings. President Joseph F. Smith
Beer description: You like the Beer and it has a good head. Any other descriptions of the beer? Color, Aroma or flavor? Maybe a little background on what a Tripel should taste like? A Comparison? Anything? Nope! You like it and it has a great head? Sounds like a night at Cat House.
And then she knew it was time to let go.
instead of an angel.
1 lb. catfish fillets
5. The craziest thing you've ever found in your car that perhaps wasn't yours?
You start out in the morning, determined to have your quiet time.
Here’s how to beat the pain naturally:
Tarts may be reheated in toaster.
Business Goals
next week i'll be in the city meeting with the heads of Bright Pink to see what kind of volunteer work i can do - but i still need your help and support with my race coming up in May! - any little donation will help - and i BEG for even just $5 - this money goes straight to Susan G. Komen to find a cure for breast and ovarian cancer! - i need funds and teammates for my run - PLEASE, yes i'm BEGGING, for a little support - it would me the world to me and more! - let's make it that our daughters will NEVER have to worry about this disease ever again!!!!!
The Henry Game ISBN: 1446453626; Delilah and the Dark Stuff ISBN: 0552547948; Mad, Bad and Totally Dangerous ISBN: 1446453669.
Hope you find a moment to join me on a regular basis as I reflect on this roller coaster ride we call “LIFE”, starting with…..
Well its Thursday and we have a new challenge for you over at D'Arcy's Diaries, this time we would like to see your project with D'Arcy on them as well as Buttons and Bows - how easy is that!
A couple things of note.
** Subscribe to this blog via Feedburner enter your email on the right. Make sure you confirm your subscription. ( counts as 3 extra entries) Be sure to leave 3 separate comments saying "I subscribed to your blog #1" and so on) Current subscribers count as well!
On August 19, I estimated I had about 90,000 words to go out of a 110,000 word novel. I have to keep changing estimates, though. Now I feel the book is probably closer to 120,000-130,000 words in length, and I'm about, maybe just a little over, halfway. I've completed over 70,000 words, so I have about 50,000 to 60,000 words to go. (I'm not sure this math adds up, but, what the heck.)
When it got about time for us to play and there we're many kids around, Fati went off with the kids and managed to round up some families! She's amazing.
I have a few more to tey before the night is over, so I have to run.
Children with autism usually do not respond to traditional methods of speech treatment where the child is asked “to do what I do, say what I say, or follow these instructions.” Sara Rosenfeld-Johnson coined the term “oral placement therapy” to describe special methods used by many SLPs to help children develop appropriate speech motor plans and gestures (See Reference: Bahr & Rosenfeld-Johnson, 2010).
Exploding in my face
Happy Birthday dear the greatest mother-in-law that I am so lucky to also be friends with
Rodrigo Duterte IV executes last remaining suspected drug pusher in Davao;
When I got there I explained to my stylist that I thought my hair was long and boring and just needed some help! She listened to my concerns and then went to work trying to give me the best haircut possible. As she finished styling my hair I was a little nervous, because I did not want my hair this short. However, now that I've had a few days with my new haircut, I think it is just the change I needed!
For those who aren't facebook friends or real life friends, short version of what's going on. My mom had a major stroke on March 29, her left side is paralyzed and it pretty much killed off her entire right side of the brain. She was still alert though that Tues and Wed and we thought OK that's a good sign. Little did we know that would be the (currently) last time we would see her that alert. Thurs she started going downhill, and by Friday afternoon she was non responsive and what we know now, basically in a coma. She stayed that way through the following Tues, which the doctors finally did another CT Scan. Come to find out she had another stroke over the weekend, this time on the left side of her brain. Thankfully it wasn't major. When you have a stroke, the brain swells, and pushes against the good part of the brain, thus causing it to lose function as well. She had major swelling on the right side, and slight swelling on the left side. Tuesday the doctors told us that she'd most likely only live a few more days. She was deteriorating rapidly and nothing seemed to be getting better. She spent that entire weekend in AFIB and that is what caused the two strokes.
9.Push It Fast!
I looked around, saw no shelter,
and then she got to work.
grayest of gray-suited office buildings:
There was some fun in the character of Miss Silver. She is the detective, an elderly woman who knits. She is quirky, fun and witty, so for me she makes the book interesting. After I finished I am still not sold on all mystery but I will try again.
So sorry guys – I wrote this late last night and forgot to hit “publish”!
The thrill of the till clanging shut on twenties. Notes not coins. This is the man who’s lived a bit. Driven to Spain with ducks in the back. Not much gets him going.
Daniel’s green eyes rolled. “If you can manage it without fainting, help them get their stuff moved into their space, and I’ll go pick up some sandwiches or something.” ~
What do you like least about your job?
PA: It’s spaghetti squash and Texas Chainsaw Chili. Try it. You’ll like it.
magnificent L'Hotel Des Invalides - buriel place to Napoleon Bonaparte
SASQUATCH!
74. Wear a bathing suit with out dying on the inside.
A matter of (weeks?) ago, I put up a post about stories you may have written yourself that were of an adult nature. There was a reason for this question and I think now is the time to divulge my secret little blog!
Where: 7232 Wynnwood Houston, TX 77008
Visit Barry White’s website:
That night, telegraph communications around the world began to fail; there were reports of sparks showering from telegraph machines, shocking operators and setting papers ablaze. All over the planet, colorful auroras illuminated the nighttime skies, glowing so brightly that birds began to chirp and laborers started their daily chores, believing the sun had begun rising.
You have to live with the idea of loss and learning. They are connected. They are always fighting each other. Losses makes you want to ignore the learning and not losing makes you think you don’t need it.
Sing near the lighthouse ,
theBalm’s Hot Mama was the first blush I ever purchased – and it’s the only blush I’ve used since then. I had read many reviews raving about NARS blush in Orgasm, as well as Benefit’s Coralista, which both seemed to be peachy coral blushes with gold sparkles or shimmer. I had been looking into theBalm as a brand, and found their products much more appealing in terms of price and amount of product – Hot Mama was the most economical choice and seemed a similar colour – peachy coral with tiny specks of sparkle. Not to mention the packaging is adorable and it comes with a mirror inside.
The same collapse swept the eastern seaboard of North America, where settled farming villages were established by 2000 BCE, and complex agricultural societies with rich political, cultural and religious traditions thrived for many centuries before 1492. (A thousand years before the founding of Jamestown, the level of cultural sophistication in the Chesapeake Bay tribes was arguably higher than that found among the inhabitants of Dark Age England.) After a century of dieoff, the survivors were scattered in small communities across a mostly vacant landscape. That was what the first waves of European colonists encountered. They told themselves they were settling in a wilderness, but they were quite wrong: they were arriving in a land that had been settled and farmed for countless generations before their time, and benefited immensely from the legacies of the peoples whose surviving descendants they elbowed out of the way.
In releasing the telephone survey of 612 adults, Galante said Wednesday he was particularly dismayed to learn that 57 percent of the Catholics believed Jesus had sinned during his time on Earth and was “no different” from other human beings — in sharp contrast to core church teaching that Jesus was without sin. Only 28 percent of non-Catholic Christians thought Jesus had sinned.
I was interviewed by the local radio and on the drive home everything just came together. Still feels a little odd to say that I'm French - but in the same way that it feels odd to say that I'm 30 - it hasn't totally sunk in yet.
We’re getting close…there may actually be a light at the end of the tunnel. Of course it wouldn’t come without some dramatics prior to, but should we expect anything less?
By this time Marcel had arrived (cow-sighting-news travels fast), everyone hopped into the pick-up and off we drove down the nice lady's farm lane. The lane was long, and it divided a large pasture with trees and some dairy cattle on the left from a very large cornfield on the right. AS we drove on, we got to the bottom of a long hill and into the middle of another soybean field where the lane basically joined up with a long waterway running through the middle. There was a pretty cottonwood tree in the waterway and a gentle creek flowing through.
I want to thank everyone that commented on the last one.. and the prayers! I appreciate them! I need them! Our daughter needs them! And thank you for participating in the miracle that God has in store for us all!
He loved the artist Vanessa Bell, sister of Virginia Woolf, and lived with her at Charleston Farmhouse in Sussex, England where they produced art together for 50 years. They also decorated the walls, mantelpieces, and furniture of the house with their distinctive designs. And he was a member of the Bloomsbury group. From the many stories that the various members have told, one gets the feeling that Duncan Grant was beloved by all.
For 62 children. Her teacher was cracking up.
That post had stayed in the back of my mind and as I agonised over the idea of changing, I went back and reread it. I thought it would persuade me to stick with what I had. No! As I read, I realized that the thing that was holding me back from changing was that I placed too high a priority on all the things I love (and will miss!) about Genbox, but things have changed, and they are no longer so relevant.
- It's been a tough end to the year, I have more animals than I can throw a stick at and there has been plenty of marital unrest.
We’ve an infatuation with dying, the disease of man
I wasn’t quite ready, however, for what I experienced during my time here. For one thing, on my way to pastoral ministry, the Lord gave me a deep enjoyment of the study of the Old Testament through the teaching of Mark Futato, Richard Pratt, and Bruce Waltke. He then provided a way for me to pursue a doctoral degree in Semitic Languages and Literatures, so that I could be paid to do what I already love to do.
1/3 lb penne
Bear Republic Hop Rod Rye
In conclusion, this weapon actively promoted bad teamplay (by holding back and not drawing fire), bad gameplay (by encouraging spam), entirely changing the point of engineer (the primary weapon is used to defend your buildings, not to go lone wolfing); simultaneously, it punishes good teamplay. There is literally one reason to use the vanilla shotgun over this weapon, and that’s a small damage increase – but the damage difference is only noticable if every single one of your pellets hits. It can be compared to why the Vita Saw is banned in most competitive leagues; it provides a very, very safe alternative – there’s no point in using the situational and risky ubersaw if you can use the vitasaw, which rewards you for doing nothing. In the same way, the Pomson is a very safe alternative to the vanilla shotgun, but instead of a health penalty you have ridiculously over the top power. Use it if you must, but understand that you have my undying hatred if you do.
I have belonged to the National Trust for nearly thirty years now. I joined while visiting Moreton Hall in Cheshire. I was with a group from Birmingham University. We were doing a tour of Alan Garner Country. This was long before I thought of writing myself and while I was signing up I had no idea how important membership would be for me. Since then, I have visited houses and gardens again and again, all over the country.
We are also grateful for our classmates and delight in the diversity of cultures represented at our school.
We do seem to have a lot in common with the Freeman Militia. I wonder if they’re truly like us.
David Cameron, the Prime Minister, expressed his anger at the promotion of a grandiose Brussels project at a moment when EU leaders were supposed to be taking tough decisions that would lead to painful austerity measures imposed on millions of people.
This Happened…
Only one Winner will be drawn
Proverbs 9:10 uses the word fear,
The street was shady and trashy, just like Principal Sal. The houses on both sides were decrepit colors of white, yellow, and pink. White-picket fences and crisp cut grass with garden gnomes did not pertain to its particular qualities. Adrien’s car door opened and he jumped out with a huge black back pack that he carried whenever he was at school, a skate board, and a lit cigarette. Adrien, who was five inches taller than me at 6’4, had “Beiber Cut” and was usually tan. Today he looked like his paler identical twin brother, Andrew.
He added: ‘But because they once were ...... they are still not comfortable enough with the new situation they’re in. ‘They still can’t accept the fact that they are completely accepted everywhere ..... it’s all in their minds.’
Saturday & Sunday.
‘Our bourgeoisie is already worthless for any noble endeavour. We did not defend Germany against Bolshevism back then because we were not intending to do anything like conserve a bourgeois world or go so far to freshen it up. Had communism really intended nothing more than a certain purification by eliminating isolated rotten elements from among the ranks of our so-called “upper ten thousand” or our equally worthless Philistines, one could have sat back quietly and looked on for a while.’
Enjoy your day,
With regards to the work produced by female students I was interested in finding out whether it could be said to be gendered in terms of a number of different aspects including how is gender difference is manifested, for example, through the physical or social environment or cultural issues represented. As well as whether the actual methods were gendered and whether we could talk about the techniques of sound work as being either masculine or feminine? Ancillary questions related to the use of the voice in the work – in particular the singing voice, how works created different stories about gender and the listener’s knowledge of the artist’s gender inform their understanding of the work in any way? Finally I was interested in finding out whether women talked about their work differently from men?
Easy Answers:
Frances Dittmer divorced Thomas Dittmer and stayed on at Refco as a consultant. It was during Bennett’s tenure that she built the photography collection.
As I struggle thru chemo I find myself reliving other episodes of survival in my life, particularly ones that required emotional endurance. In the forefront of my mind lately is one of the most difficult chapters of my life -- the saga of my struggle to become a mother.
Roy: That’s what I want to find out. I want you to tell me the names of the fellows on the St. Louis team.
"Anzac belongs now to a period - the early part of the last century - that is just beginning to pass out of first-hand human experience and witness, and, like all of what we know from back there, it has begun to develop the romantic glow of a reality softened, relieved of the sharper details and rich contradiction through which personal experience challenges and contradicts received views. It begins to have about it an aura of mystery we cannot penetrate and which, precisely for that reason, has a strong pull on our imagination and on our feelings.
Read and let read!
It was widely reported, earlier this month, that the British Government has threatened to cut aid to governments of “countries that persecute homosexuals” unless they stop punishing people in same-sex relationships. These threats follow similar decisions that have been taken by a number of other donor countries against countries such as Uganda and Malawi. While the intention may well be to protect the rights of LGBTI people on the continent, the decision to cut aid disregards the role of the LGBTI and broader social justice movement on the continent and creates the real risk of a serious backlash against LGBTI people.
I hope to get it done tomorrow night.
Fortunately, Korfu had the ability to see almost perfectly in darkness… even pitch darkness such as this. Praymar, as it happened, had the same ability.
Sending love and light and everything good to you all tonight. xxx
Dress, Jam’s World (thrifted). Shirt, Old Navy. Belt, thrifted. Leggings, Allen B. Moccasins, Minnetonka (gift). Earrings, Monica D. Bag, Nine West.
Lenna also included her signature square.
We're having coffee.
Anyways. My only issue with Vickie and her secrets, is that I am pretty sure she discriminates against the big girls. And when I say girls I don't mean boobs this time. I mean actual girls. Ladies. Women. Women who may not be the size of Heidi Klum and all her cronies, but still want to feel sexy in their chonies. I personally have always loved to wear cutesie bras and panties because I can't wear everything I want.
He's a magic man." yeah ... oh ...
One of the most anticipated XC State meets for XC fans each year is the Illinois State Meet. IL has a very deep and talented history in the sport. This years Meet was no different.4 (!) teams (#3 Naperville North, #5 Elmhurst York, #11 Geneva and #14 Neuqua Valley, the defending State and National Champs) ranked in the top 20 Nationally went head to head ,yes, 4 teams ranked in the top 20 Nation-wide. After 3 miles the Kyle Gibson led Naperville North team edged the Steve Sulkin led York team by the slimmest of margins 84-85. Geneva and Neuqua Valley followed in 3rd and 4th. It must be something to be ranked # 14 in the nation (and defending Nike Team Nationals Champ)and not crack the top 3 in your State Final, but that is the price you pay for competing in a state that has a very stong distance history. I actually feel that even though York lost the meet they can still take the National title. In a race diluted with more elite front-runners the duo of Steve Sulkin and Jordan Hebert both have top 10 potential. We'll see.
We also went to the Tiskiwin Museum founded by Dutch anthropologist, Bert Flint, who collected North African art from the sahara, Morocco, Mali, and nearby surrounding areas. The museum exhibits basketry, jewelry, textiles, and woodcarvings – all very beautiful.
So I had one of those awful revelations, the one that you get in the middle of the night. Anyways, I was thinking about my other blog and that there is a link to it on a website with steps to be goth, long story, don’t ask. Well, I realized that another site said that you had to take it slow or else people would call you a poser. It made sense but now I just think that it is so very wrong.
You'd better slow down
“It’s just too bad that somebody would do something like that,” Fellers said.
Update: I was told that it’s a parking garage not the actual library. And still it looks awesome, isn’t? What can I say? A suitable building for storing books.
Now soaring
Due to the suspected link between vaccines and autism, more than 5,000 U.S. families have filed claims in a federal vaccine court against the companies producing the vaccines. In most cases, the plaintiffs received no compensation and all correlation between the illness and vaccines was denied by the defendants. A public relations war has been going on for years, as studies and counter-studies have appeared, proving or denying the links between vaccines and autism, depending where they originate from. The studies claiming that vaccines are safe have often been funded by the very companies that produce them.
“Yes… remembered you were in my brother’s party” (He was real Player, What a shot! Kudos!!)
Still, there were some cool ideas. It’s just that they were not followed through. Take Karna, for example. Easily one of the most complex figures in not just Mahabharata but any epic in any civilisation, one can do a lot with his story. In Tharoor’s telling, Mohammed Ali Karna is denied his rightful place by the arrogant Dhritarashtra and Pandu, and goes off to create the Muslim homeland of Karnistan – the hacked-off (that is, circumcised) land. (See what I mean about the Rushdieesque irreverence).
This week and next at Observatory! Hope to see you there.
After a hard day at work, she returns to her rooftop apartment and finds four men sitting on her floor. What da…?
Do you want to get some Malabrigo scraps without having to purchase 10 different skeins yourself?
Only a live thing leaps my hand,
The article is from British newspaper “The Daily Mail.”
The overwhelming majority of CHL holders I've met over the years have been incredibly responsible when it comes to adult beverages while they have a firearm on them or about them. This includes the younger generation. In fact, the younger generation seems to often times be MORE mature about that than those of my generation and age.
The trust she has built with her subjects, and the consent they have given have enabled this form of portrayal to communicate what she has seen to the viewer.
So with a little over a week to digest the “results” of my 30 in 30 project, I thought I’d share with you some insights I picked up, and an easy place to check out all the offerings for something that might catch your eye.
On Friday, April 22, 2011 the red-headed repeat criminal offender otherwise known as Lindsay Lohan was sentenced to jail for a FOURTH time. Yet despite her ever growing rap sheet that includes drugs, DUI, assault, probation violations and now thievery, Lindsay was released from jail just mere hours after being sentenced to 120 days incarceration for violating her probation by stealing a designer necklace from a jewelry store.
When Avery (Thomas) convinces some friends (Dana, Galecki, Flanery, Mohr, and Thomas) to kidnap retired mob boss Charlie Bennett (Walken) in the hopes of forcing him to help locate Avery's kidnapped sister, they Ivy Leaguers quickly find themselves out of their depth. Things prove to be more complicated than even they even appear to begin with when, Charlie's eyes and ears on the street (Leary) discovers that one of the four friends was also involved in the kidnapping of the sister and that an elaborate double-cross may be afoot.
Going for a run, slugging a punching bag, or a fierce cleaning rampage are all methods I have heard people use to let out pent up aggression from a stressful, day, week, month or year (who knows?!). But last Wednesday morning when I told my friend’s dad that I had duked it out by making my own breadcrumbs, it definitely made him do the “head-tilt”. You know what I’m taking about – the tilt those pugs on YouTube do every time their owner asks them a question…complete confusion. No disrespect to pug lovers globally (seeing as I am a devout owner and fanatic of the wrinkly aliens), but they definitely capture that same sentiment that overwhelmed this dear man that morning. I told him that while it wasn’t my intention when I first decided to make my own breadcrumbs (in fact it was inspired by the fact that I had a rock-hard baguette that could double as a WMD if I didn’t do something with it), as I sat in my apartment pounding this French staple into coarse shavings, I could not help but feel the frustration from my typical work day leave my nerves and travel through my instrument to make something I was then going to use for my dinner. Now if that is not a healthy and effective way to cope with stress, I don’t know what is!
Supporting by Sleep Parade.
I chose Red Journey because it was my very first purely abstract painting, and as such represents a big turning point in my art career. I had spent most of my life until then believing abstract art to not be real art. I had spent a lot of time studying and creating realistic art, even going so far as to get a masters degree in illustration. (Ironically, it was studying illustration that eventually lead to this breakthrough, but perhaps that is a story for another time.) But when I painted Red Journey - and I remember the entire process very clearly, from first inspiration to finished product, even though it was 7 years ago - it was almost as if I was a conduit for a larger creativity. I had never felt inspiration that strongly before, nor been so sure that the outcome was a true expression of my inner vision. And that has become my definition of real art - true expression, and I've been hooked on it ever since.
Now, people will purposely cut into your lane without so much as a blinker and expect you to yield. This morning I almost lost it. I had several cars try to get in my lane while I was in it. The lane that I had already waited 10 minutes in to get to where I was. They zipped past all of the other cars behind me and decided I was the sucker that was going to let them in. Guess what? They were SO VERY WRONG. I did not let them in. I held my ground and almost got a white stripe down the side of my very red car.
For the record, the cost of his six day trip to India (accompanied by his private secretary as is normal practice) came in at just over €9,000.
I put Natty's walking stick back into the closet. It's on the left side, propped up against the front corner and is very much out of sight, unless you are specifically looking for it. On the right side, there is a tiny nook area and I put one of our air mattresses over there. It's all folded up and neat, as it has never been used before. (We have three of them.) I plan to put it out in the garage once we get the room for it made out there. But that's another process altogether.
And that was that: my brush with fame. It was only 3 minutes, so if Andy Warhol's right then I still have another 12 minutes to have some other time. If it's like yesterday, I think I might just be looking forward to it.
I was very frustrated. I sat through a shift change and now it was going on 5 o'clock. I knew my husband was beyond worried because I had been on a 7 hour shopping trip. I just wanted to tell him where I was. And it sucked to be waiting so long and knowing that the process to get me out was not even underway. They finally gave me my phone call at 5:30. Hubs picked up the phone. I was so thrilled to hear his voice. "Babe. I'm in jail." I told him. He said "I'm already at the bail bondsman place." I started sobbing. I though he would just be at home worried sick about me. But he had looked for me until he found me. I loved him so much. Between sobs I asked "How did you know where I was?" He told me not to worry about that but know that he was doing everything he could to get me out. I breathed a huge sigh of relief knowing that he was on the case.
*Jillibean Southern Chicken Dumpling Soup: Cardstock Stickers
I've searched around quite a lot either on Tumblr, other Lolita blogs, magazines you name it, for inspiration and it was quite hard finding something that I like and suits me and is Lolita like too. I found Shelby Cloud's bedroom very creative. I loved how the ceiling was painted as little pink clouds, and that she decorates the walls with shelves with an extra hint of cuteness to them.
the resilient orchids even had a little tag that said "easy as a-b-c". so effective.
You’ll notice on the footer of the blog an interesting statistic. That is where I will be keeping track of my progress on a daily basis. Now I can already see in my mind’s eye the idea of cheating this system, but it will have to rely on my honesty for the time being. Terry Pratchett once remarked that he writes a little every day, even if it was only a few hundred words. It must work for him as he has published, on average two novels a year for a total of 68 books by my count. Isaac Asimov even more, quite a lot more actually. When asked what he would do if he only had a month left to live, Isaac reportedly answered “Write faster.”
Pub. Date: January 2nd 2012
At first Kate is determined to keep her distance from everyone, closing herself off and looking for chances to break the rules. But Maddy sneaks in under Kate’s radar and the two develop a friendship that becomes deeply important to both of them. They are both struggling with issues – Maddy lost her mother to cancer recently and her ways of coping have led her to be judged by the other girls. Except Kate. Kate is too used to being judged herself to do it to anyone else.
drinks with cherry or grape juice ice trays, the clean-up would be easy if
When I came across this recipe, I was unconvinced. There is no butter in these cupcakes. I'm so accustomed to using butter, and usually quite a bit of it, in my baking, that the idea made me a bit uneasy. But I'm glad I worked through my hesitations and gave these a try.
I guess it could be worse. I could be eating 2003 Halloween candy.
madeleine moment (citing in effect the moment in Proust's work where he eats a 'Madeleine' and a wave of memories come over him)
He worked for the Auction Network and did red-carpet coverage of the Oscar’s for Oscar.com.
I been doing homework.. I feel so smart I received a letter from my school saying that my GPA (grade point average) places in the top 3% of all students from my college *__* ! so they placed my name in the Honor List *__*!
The Past
4. I'm a night owl. I'm so glassy-eyed in the mornings that my coworkers know to avoid me until at least 10 am. My ideal hours would be 2 am bedtime and 10 am wake-up time. Whenever I'm off for a substantial amount of time, I always revert to this.
Then off to part 2 of the mission - to investigate an alleged ammo dump from WW2 that the NPWS mention in a tour brochure , heading down and across another valley I came to the top of the tunnel and began to work my way down when I came round a corner into a large cave on the hill overlooking the railway line, the first thing I see is an army ammunition box ! geez talk about bingo I thinks before seeing the rest of the cave contents - it was obviously an old hobo's home and from the items around I'd say he was living there around 10 years ago, the ammo box was from 1953 and had a newspaper from 1998 in side so that discounted it being WW2 vintage , I scratched around in the dirt on the floor and found a Halfpenny from bloody 1942 to confuse things even more !
“Cori, what is your gut telling you?”
THe Scrap Room April 2011 Kit
Hope you get the message to her loud and clear without hurting her that much.
Finish stuffing.
My mat has a bit of a story behind it. Over the last year I opted to regularly rent a mat at the studio, because of the hefty price attached to a Manduka mat. Long story short, I fell in love with the color of this mat (yes its under a towel for class but I have to see it in my room and when I haul it around with me) and decided to make the investment for the challenge, as buying it came to almost the same price as renting it 30 times. I think the color is gorgeous, and as for the price, well at least the product is guaranteed for life.
To my body. We share a house
Location: Romanza Le Restaurant, Terrace at Hock Choon, 241 Lorong Nibong, off Jalan Ampang, 50450 Kuala Lumpur (behind Hock Choon Supermarket).
The large clear pins I colored with a Copic to match the paper.
The USAF lent the Twin Mustang in 1966 and, not unusually, required its return should the CAF no longer have use for it. That really means to give it back instead of the USAF losing a part of its heritage, a standard practice.
Characters: José 13 year old kid, his best friend Pablo, Their homeroom teacher Mr. somm, The evil student Aloj and the less important characters.
I'll take the freedom of choice, and the hard won peace that every still portrait from my life has brought me to.....
She joined the Royal Ballet as an Artist in 1999 and was promoted to First Soloist in 2000. In April 2001 she was promoted to Principal.
Complications in pregnancy have fallen as a result of the ban on smoking in public places, according to a new study.
Perseverance = not giving up. About two verses back, Galatians mentions that we’ll be reaping what we sow. Planting good in my life and doing it diligently means that later on in life, the harvest I’ll have will also be good. That’s worth some bother, I think.
And THE NUMBER ONE TEAM IN THE NATION - LSU, my mother-in-law's beloved alma mater - JUST LOST.
This is why I honor my ancestors, knowing full well there were misdeeds and wrongs done. Because they faced a world different than what I have, and they did what they could to survive and make a better world for their descendants. The fact that the current batch running our world seems only interested in forgetting history, making a good life for themselves, and leaving future generations (mine included) with the bill while bashing those that came before, well….It makes me feel something not nice. The fact that they’ve trained many of my fellows with much the same attitude they have (only when the last government subsidy is gone and the last of your freedoms vanishes will you realize that you’ve been made a slave) sometimes steals hope. They are the first generation in history who not only didn’t grow the population, but screwed it after their deaths.
But I think this reenactment takes the cake. The students were acting out the "Frankly, my dear, I don't give a damn scene from Gone With the Wind". They interpreted the scene as needing to run out into the hallway, the girl sobbing at the top of her lungs and yelling "Rhett! Rhett!" among other lines and then slamming the door. All is well with that... except that was the very end of the last class... also known as lunchtime. The secretaries were all sitting out there at the large table already eating. God only knows what they thought.
11) AN 84-YEAR-OLD ex-university official savagely attacked by four young punks during a walk in Wissahickon Valley Park earlier this week theorizes that the beating he endured was a cruel game of "get the old geezer."
By the time we checked in, got the car parked, had the valet bring the car back so we could get a cell phone out of it, and walked the 5 or 6 blocks over to the convention center, the line was as huge as ever. People were lined down Stout Street nearly back out the N. Speer Boulevard side of the convention center. People at the GABF are surprisingly patient though.
“Is it bad to be curious?”
Don’t worry; this is going somewhere. Well, sort of.
"We have a 'usability' problem -- average alcohol by volume is way too high to be sipping multiple beers down at the river, cutting the lawn or at the game," says Joseph Tucker, owner and operator of RateBeer, who sees session beer as a solution to craft beer's summer quandary. "High-alcohol beer is more filling, it has more calories and it's dehydrating, and this makes the average craft beer a problem in the summertime."Can you drink big beer in the summer? Sure: that's what air-conditioning is for. I had an Otto's Double D during Philly Beer Week in the coolly chilled Grey Lodge Pub, and it tasted great. But when I was sweating it at a packed event later in the week, doors and windows open wide to try to get a breath of air into the place? Nice cold Kenzinger, baby.
Dec. 31: A SCOTTISH NEW YEAR (All about Hogmanay - Scottish New Year, even more important than Christmas in Scotland! Featuring Scottie, Westie and Corgi cards)
By those who allow
Unfortunately for iPad 1 users, this cover only works with the new iPad 2. The iPad 2 has magnets inside the aluminum casing that allow the Smart Cover to be attached, so there’s no way it would work with the first iPad. Another common gripe is that it doesn’t cover the back of the iPad, but you can obviously tell that just by glancing at it, and if thats such a big problem for you, there are many Smart Cover compatible back cases, or you could opt for an entirely different case.
(Then) Cardinal Ratzinger would have been primarily charged with evaluating the doctrinal issues regarding Fr. Murphy’s alleged violation of the sacrament of reconciliation … not the abuse allegations.
This is a photo I took of the moon while it was playing hide and seek with the clouds tonight. Never mind the grain, I took it with the iPhone camera in HDR mode and thought it’s really cool, especially because of the flare caused on the side by a street lamp. It almost makes it look like a portrait of the sun and the moon together. The wonders of photography.
One very good exercise that Sue has us work on is taking a step sideways, off the inside leg and halting. Then from the halt take a step sideways and walk. Then we do it trot to walk. Then we do it while trotting. It gets Rogo listening and responding to my inside leg more readily. Sue's training programs are very consistent as the horse and rider move up the levels, so you might see a PSG horse doing a similar exercise. I like that the pieces clearly build on one another.
So I sat there thinking .... always dangerous ..... and wondered if the Smooch would take the SU ink. As I was washing out the mini mister my eye caught onto another cool SU product called Shimmer Paint/Ink. I already knew the Smooch faded out my green so I decided to give the Shimmer Ink a try.
if you like ELLA on Facebook then please write 'ELLA FB'
We love you Shawn!
Definition:
There has been a constant state of threat that has engendered a siege mentality in the minds of the small business owners who create most of America’s jobs.
/opt/VRTSob/jre.tar
this video synopsis of this adult romance ebook on the art of kissing is by: Cherry A.
Nancy noticed the people in the café staring at them.
Q. You are a graduate of UNC’s journalism school. How has journalism education changed from when you were a student, and what changes do you see ahead?
“Why did you tell him? I’m fine.” I said defiant.
Overall boring day I guess. I'm sure I'm forgetting stuff, but I'm too tired to think, nevermind write. So I'm off (possibly to bed) for now.
The wind chills here in Wisconsin are so ridiculous that school is closed tomorrow. Minus 30 to minus 40 wind chill!
Alan had in effect prepared a lecture more like a military briefing; something I daresay as a senior Intelligence officer during World War 2 he would have done many times. Every word was exact in its meaning and there was no wasted phrase in any sentence. Every paragraph was a package of orderly, detailed information. Each page was a literary gem.
The most common complaints include irritated nasal passages, headaches, lethargy, rashes, vomiting and fevers.
After my shock at having successfully baked bread waned down enough for me to function again, I made 2 spreads so we could make bruschetta: a tangy tomato and kalamata olive relish and a spicy chimichurri. They were both so delicious, Tom and I almost ate the whole loaf!
After lunch my group headed down to the other lab to do Practical Chemical Analysis. Our main goal was to perform what's called a congress mash. This is basically a mash schedule done by maltsters to determine a number of things dealing with malt. We also checked the malt for the total nitrogen content and ran it through a Friabilimeter to check for beta glucan levels as well as checking the moisture content with a special machine. After the congress mash we looked at extract, pH, and color. Below is a video of a titration which is part of the process for check the nitrogen content of malt.
Other people have bigger problems.
We don't just have compassion and then do nothing with it. The Lord has allowed those in Christ to participate in His Divine Nature and He has given us EVERYTHING we need for life and godliness. When He was moved...He was moved to do something. He was filled and moved by compassion even in the midst of sharing in our sufferings. Faith without deeds is no faith at all. Oh that the Lord would open our eyes to not only a global awareness of spiritual and physical poverty but a local one as well. I pray for whoever reading this that the Lord will open your eyes to someone that He wants you to help even this week. That we would stop losing on the minors and focus our attention on what is major...like a starving little child. Starved for the Lord only knows what.
Today was our summer kickoff program and it was a zoo out there---literally and figuratively! Fantasy Corral came with 20 different, and amazing, animals including...wait for it....an otter! Her name is Blossom and she really does make a splash in her pool swimming clockwise around and around. The red object is her firefighters helmet.
UP TO 35% OFF Have the next Apprentice on your hands? Set them up with a Quality Time Construction Company’s cute lemonade stand.
And did he leave it at that, recover, and clean up his mess? Of course not. He sat down on the toilet, shat out some kind of worm/alien/lamprey thing (I never did figure out which), and promptly died, leaving the worm/alien/lamprey thing to run about and wreak havoc, and I don't know what all, because I had to do the dishes. Not all of us can sit around and watch shite and eat bon-bons, you know.
"...now is the time to come out of my closet with this emphatic statement: The thirty-second spot - at least as it exists today - is either dead, dying, or has outlived its usefulness. Take your pick."Joseph Jaffe on The BeanCast, 2011
look how nice is this scene
We're celebrating with hot dogs and SusieCakes Giants cupcakes!
Yes, yes, I know. Some people might class all this as simply the inevitable result of Bad Timekeeping. Those of us who have had meetings with Occupational Health, however, know that these are an important part of the rehabilitation process. My phased return aims to Reestablish Working Patterns.
5. I have been painting the bedroom a robin's egg blue. There is one small area left to finish this morning.
As the laptop search continues, a romance develops between Phoenix and Tiger to help her cope with the heartache and pad the running time between fight scenes. We're given the whole melodramatic love story shebang; Vaseline-soaked lenses, sorrowful color-tinged filter flashbacks and a sex scene set to some distractingly poppy groove music. Then we discover that Tiger isn't a genuine criminal, but rather an undercover agent trying to takedown Black Dragon and prevent those satellite codes from falling into the wrong hands. I can't lay the blame on Phoenix's doorstep for not seeing this one; a codename like Tiger carries no connotation toward someone working undercover (although, I believe Tiger's original moniker was Chameleon in a roughcut version of the film). Now, if Tiger had chewed an effeminate magician's face half off to her surprise, I'd have to start looking at resumes on Monster.com for thieves with laptop pilfering expertise and skills with assigning codenames without bad omens.
The programme screened on 21 September must have used the term “Apartheid Regime” about five times in the opening statements. I don’t know if they do this just to attract more black viewers, but it had me losing interest very quickly, --- until they got to the part about a white farmer whose foolish ploughing techniques possibly transformed a perfectly fertile piece of ground into an area what has now become known as the Red Desert, a region situated in Pondoland (Eastern Cape) between the Mtentu River and Port Edward. I wasn’t actually watching the TV screen when the presenter made this ridiculous and unsubstantiated comment, I was just listening while reading a magazine, and didn’t notice if the presenter had his tongue in his cheek, or not. Nevertheless, I quickly sensed that the chap was just fooling around when he proceeded to mention other possible reasons why the place had become a red desert.
The hearts were punched, folded in half, and glued so that they pop off of the page nicely. I like the simplicity of it. And it's easypeasy enough that my 7 year-old helped me with the cutting and gluing!
Not long before 1975 he would have swung. As it happens he lost sixteen years of his life and died a year after his release. Tragic.
Within a day, I had read and signed Courtney for PROOF BY SEDUCTION and I’m just beyond excited to share this manuscript with you. And yes, I know you are going to kill me because I’m sending you this email right before RWA but hey, both Courtney and I will be there so let me know if you want to meet up.
The prayer procedure is as follows.
Have a good one!
However, Salmond claimed victory, saying:
Now it must be said that given that I am hurtling towards 40 (which I am reliably informed is the new 30), and given that I recently became a daddy and hence my days of staying out until sunrise have been seriously curtailed, I still have a VAGUE idea of what the kids get up to around here.
Kepa Artaraz
We should all do the things we love as often.
Bad: I’m going to eat better.
If Simon can learn to control his powers, and if Otis can convince him to work against London, there might be chance to stop it. But Simon has no clue how to get the weather to obey him, and Ruby, though she can understand the weather intellectually, lacks his raw, magical talent.... I found this a nice twist--Ruby isn't the Special One, and so is in a rather complicated position that's unusual in middle grade fantasy.
c) Rename the Photos: Your Name + Pic 1 and Pic 2
The mind boggles. The imagination races. I could go on – but I won’t. There are 17,810 entries after all! But I will leave you with a question. Many items, inevitably, are somewhat mysterious, and here's one entry that just now caught my eye. Seven 'Rackettes for the tennys' is clear enough as a description, but have you any suggestion as to what game 'two handes battes of Siluer guilt' might have been used for?
I’m sorry it’s taken me so long to post these, even though it’s been over a month since I took them. I’ve been incredibly busy at work and doing freelance graphic work. I’m going away for president’s day weekend, so I’ll have more new pictures coming soon.
master a new skill
All my life I have gathered beautiful women around me like a Victorian butterfly collector. My current friends - the women with whom I gossip over coffee, walk the dog and go to parties - tend to be stunning, toned and well-groomed.
Out of nowhere the other day Kai said "Papa says that sometimes I make bad decisions and sometimes mama makes bad decisions and sometimes papa makes bad decisions but he still loves me and he is still happy." I swoop him up and give him a giant hug and tell him he is right. He proceeds to tell me we also all make good decisions too. Then he says "See I remember everything" I know he listens to what we say, I know he is incredibly intelligent and emotionally in tune. This also makes me feel especially bad because I am not always the most patient. Parenting is difficult while grieving. I hope he can remember how much I tell him I love him.
Clean the grease from the microwave
“East of Eden” has a biblical reference and is considered a place to which “Cain” chose to flee after murdering his brother “Abel”. Steinbeck has taken that as the basis of the book and has built a story around it.
What this means is that writing costs money in the short term, and until you earn a respectable income from book sales, you’ll need a way to finance your efforts. For most, it means working full time and writing when you can, but it doesn’t have to be that way. By planning ahead and investing wisely, you can build a stable income that will support your writing and help you move away from depending on a paycheck toward becoming a financially-independent writer.
I was down in Argentina a few years ago on vacation, just having fun – playing polo of all things, actually, and at a cafe I heard a couple of girls speaking English. So I went up to them, and they explained to me that they were doing volunteer work, specifically a shoe drive. They were basically getting wealthy people to give slightly used shoes and collecting them to give to children in areas where they didn’t have the shoes needed to go to school. I was extremely surprised to hear that the kids needed shoes that badly and that kids were not being allowed to go to school because they didn’t have shoes. When I thought about it that night, I didn’t want to just write a check and make a donation- because, if I did that, the kids would just get a shoe once . . . and my financial contribution would only be a very temporary relief.
We held the May Crowning that afternoon at school. It was a beautiful prayer service with lots of fragrant, vibrant flowers hand sheared from the children’s home gardens. The priest who led us asked the kids to think of an intention to hold in their hearts while we asked Mother Mary’s intercession. My birthday girl was my intention. I prayed hard!
The fluid itself is very liquidy, and is a iridescent pearly white color. The texture is very moisturizing and smooth, without being heavy or greasy on the skin. Feels like a skin care product! There is no smell which I prefer, and so far it seems like it is a liquid highlighter if sorts.
Every year, Jack Evans Chevrolet sponsors events, seminars, and car shows. Throughout the year, they hold new car seminars for customers that recently purchased new vehicles. During the summer months, Jack Evans Chevrolet sponsors a car show, complete with food, music, and a best-in-show contest.
If the Cube were built simply to kill its prisoners, why supply them with clues? Conversely, starting each victim in their own room without the means to (independently) understand those clues subverts that entire scheme. Which is why I had some initial misgivings. The action began like an uncharitable video game, the kind where you must necessarily die in order to learn how not to die. At least in most games the player can restart from an earlier position. In this movie, however, the first attempt is often the final exit. Punishment, thy name is Cube . . .
It's like Tracy Morgan says: "If you want to make God laugh, make plans. Or read Him a Dave Barry book."
Also, football season is in full swing! yay for Saturdays! boo for Sundays! i just can't get into pro football. Instead of griping and whining every Sunday afternoon, I have decided to turn Sunday afternoons into crafting opportunities. This Sunday I will make...
In response,Parliament Speaker Saad el-Katatni of the Muslim Brotherhood's Freedom and Justice Party announced that parliament was suspending sessions for a week to protest the ruling military junta's failure to dismiss the present cabinet and allow the Islamists to pick a new one of their choosing.
I added some frozen spinach to this one. Anything to get more veggies in.
* Balances 25%
We were able to celebrate with some French families.
I will be heading a panel discussion with prominent local compliance officers. Our topic will be compliance best practices and our focus will be on some of the following topics: (1) The global state of play with government regulations; (2) Dealing with the latest developments regarding the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA) and the UK Bribery Act and how to incorporate these pieces of legislation into your future contracts; (3) What are some of the challenges in dealing with intermediaries, agents, consultants and business partners in a manner which is compliance with both the FCPA and Bribery Act and (4) Can a company have a best-in-class compliance program if it doesn’t include due diligence, contractual requirements and reasonable audits on partners?
I must be gaining the entire fucking world
I'm sure this new addition will make the 5 whole minutes I get to sit down there and read that much more enjoyable!!
I thought they would fill others up too, spread some encouragement, and teach accountability and ownership.
Me: “No, mom. I never spend Valentine’s Day with anyone.”
Long after we’re gone, of course.
Keep Riding!
I get a call from a woman and she starts by saying "oh. you sound like you speak very good english." Thanks, I reply. I would be pretty lost without it as it is the *only* language I speak. She tells me that because I indicated another language exists in our home (beyond what is spoken by Dora the Explorer) we need to come in for an assessment.
The stuffed Strawberry Shortcake doll!
This recipe comes courtesy of Sandra Lee. I don't care for many of her recipes but this one I do enjoy. Delicious and easy. I would imagine you could play around with the pudding mix and chips and substitute different flavors. Very simple and kid friendly!
I have a whole room at the back of my house – my study – with floor-to-ceiling shelves of books. I often devour a book in a day, especially on days when I’m too poorly to do much else.
I hate you so much
“I feel like we haven’t even talked today because of your rules,” he smirked, as I white-knuckle gripped the bar.
I'm so excited, i can hardly stand it... on Saturday (May 12) i turn 32 and B-rad and i are going to go out for curry at the most wonderful Indian place, then off to see the new Johnny Depp flick... a WHOLE night out?? i'm so pumped.
Elegant in its simplicity, a cross of beautifully cut chandelier crystals crowns a bottle of antique glass. Held fast within the rustic confines of solder that has been imbued in the time-worn hues of rusted and weathered iron, the light-throwing crystal brings the element of refinement to the cross bottle’s beautiful marriage of rough and refined.
Shamelessly lifted from Wikipedia:
Normally 8-9. Since about February, it's been broken up into 1-2 hour naps in between getting up to go pee. Yes, I pee every hour or hour and a half... all day and all night. It's annoying as hell.
What would a holiday season be without watching that timeless classic at least once. The line "No man is a failure who has friends" pretty well sums it up for me.
Meanwhile, all this unseasonal warmth has meant that our peach and greengage trees are now in flower and our doyenne de comice pear is budding nicely. The ornamental cherry will follow very shortly, but our young melrose apple and fruiting black cherry have a little while to go yet. We also found another colour break in our cowslips; an orange version. Looking over the valley towards the north Eric's field is now definitely showing the first yellow colza flowers.
“What did you hear about that teenager down the street they called the police on?” I ask her. “You know, the other night.”
Invigorating, actually, as the editor challenges me to see the work from outside myself and my own intentions toward it. To read as a reader. I think that is essential, whether it comes from an editor or not.
If you are offended, then don't read the book; but allow others to make their own decisions.
Having not danced in several months, however, I decided to attend the half hour lesson before the dance began, where I quickly made an easy spin into a game of Twister. Luckily, one of the instructors was on it, telling me to just walk forward. Really. I even learned a move that I hadn’t learned before, so it was a good lesson, especially since I hadn’t practiced the other basic moves in a while, which work best when the music isn’t that fast.
Whose game? I think I'll have a sign up every 1st of the month, so you can do it every month or skip some months if you'd like to. (CHA months are tough, lol). No big commitments ;) Feel free to add the button I've posted on my sidebar for this. The more the merrier :)
To enhance the capacity of the European Union in policy analysis and programme management in key areas. These include Maternal and Child Health, Climate Change, Wealth Creation, Water and Sanitation, and issues focussing on Fragile States, Conflict Prevention and Resolution. In addition it will provide support for stronger overall Evaluation and Monitoring of EU spend. The Programme will second approximately 25-30 high calibre DFID staff (Seconded National Experts - SNEs) to the European Commission and related organisations in Brussels and Luxembourg, EU delegations in developing countries, EU Presidencies, and to the new European External Action Service (EEAS) of the European Union. The National Experts on Professional Training scheme (NEPT) will also provide short term opportunities in the EU (Brussels) for staff to get experience and knowledge of how the EU manage their development programmes.So, nearly £14 million of our foreign aid budget goes to sending British bureaucrats to commune with Eurocrats in Brussels and elsewhere. The starving children of Sudan, to name but one location, will be delighted.
7pm-A few hot wings, large cobb salad with balsamic and olive oil (chicken, avocado, bacon, lettuce, spinach, etc.)
Now, I just gotta get this booty moving. I've never been a fan of exercise and I hate panting and sweating like a dog. Hence why summer in the pool was great for me. So I am going to break down and finally order the Zumba DVDs since I haven't found a class that works with my work schedule. *sigh* I also wanted to get opinions on the Wii game "Just Dance". Have any of you played this...I've heard it's a pretty good work out and anything that is fun and gets my booty moving is a good investment for me.
Some interesting pics from the Burberry Ad Campaign. I noticed it in this month's W Magazine.
2/3 c milk
It’s the delight in the challenge,
A big fat zero for my weight loss. I worked out 6 x last week but it just goes to show that exercise really does only account for 30% of your weight loss. Losing weight is a simple equasion you have to burn more calories than you consume. That is all. I have clearly taken in and burned the same amount. By all accounts you have to burn 3,500 calories for every 1 lb of weight loss.
Frozen Vegetables (without sauce)
The new figures from a study by the Institute of Medicine have created a stir, especially the fact that one third of American kids born in 2000 is expected to become diabetic in their lifetime. Obesity now costs America $190 billion a year.
Ok, so maybe not everyday, but definitely this weekend. Shovelin' and reorganizing, since my flowers were planted willy nilly, with no semblance of order. There's a lot of stuff going on that's just not ok...
Excellence in Writing – Medical Drama:
The 5K, held Sunday, April 22, at 7 a.m., had nearly 3,900 participants. Proceeds went to the Angels Baseball Foundation, which helps at-risk youths in Orange County by giving education grants and supporting the Boys and Girls Club and baseball clinics. The 3.1 mile race circled around Angel Stadium and the Honda Center in Anaheim, Calif.
One of the few things lately, that has made life enjoyable for me. I'm pissed. When the manager walked by and I showed him the damage, the man closed his inner door. I didn't get to tell the manager my suspicions as he was holding heavy bags of groceries and was in a hurry to get inside. More circumstantial evidence is, when that man let the kitten out this morning and it ran for planter, he came and got it.
take to the night, blue, black, and gray
DON’T let your customer get frustrated and upset by “thinking” that the process is taking too long!
Keep writing all you NaNoers!
As it happened, I reasoned and played the idea out in my head during my drive home. Over the weekend, I calculated the logistics, feasibility and budget. By the end of the weekend, I had a menu, budget, and my own itty bitty newborn lunchtime delivery service. Of course, I am only currently servicing one place once a week, but it’s a nice fun start and my own fill-in-some-free-time creative outlet. Of course, I made absolutely $0.00 this week (in the hole, when you consider labor), but I got a chance to provide something different and fresh (literally) to my office so that brightened my day.
This is partly because my neighbor, Doug,
Cathy xx :)
How does a primary student solve non-linear programming problems of a PhD candidate?
Nice message to communicate.
Spencer was quick to back down, as well. “I’m not sure, yet,” he admitted. “That’s why I’m here to find out.”
A curse is on her if she stay
These two people do certain things to, with, beside, and for each other -- they interact.
Today, Stephane and I were out shopping and he bought me another one. An amazing one... I admired it before Christmas and today it was 50% off. Who could resist? Not even him, I guess!
With this publisher, however, termination triggers a refill at the inventory pump. Whatever the publisher may have on hand (and ebooks are never really "on hand"), termination causes inventory to magically shoot up to 1,000. Worse, it delays the reversion of rights, making reversion contingent on all inventory being sold, down to the last book. Suppose your book was available from this publisher as an ebook and a POD print edition; just imagine how long it might take a small publisher to sell 1,000 copies of each format.
Nurse Meme broke into her imaginings and brought her back to reality. She held a tablespoon and a bottle. She poured the liquid into the spoon and started toward her “What’s that?” Nurse Meme cleared her throat and replied “medicine. Now open your mouth and swallow ALL of it.” Gladys did as she was told. She opened her mouth and then it hit her. The smell, then the taste of Castor Oil. “That should make you feel better” Nurse Meme declared. Gladys gagged and sputtered and spewed. “but I already feel better, momma. I don’t need anymore of that stuff. Really I feel good. I’ll go to school tomorrow I promise.” Nurse Meme raised an eyebrow and prepared the second dose. “Gladys, you take this and that is all there is to it. If you were sick enough to come home from school in the middle of a party, then you need this medicine.”
My photos from last year are here and I frequently flick through them for inspiration. It is a must for anyone who likes quilting or patchwork.
When I was reading about Kilmacduagh later I discovered that St Colman is actually buried there and a certain amount of investigation leads me to believe that I took a rather poor photograph of his grave without realising what it was! I'm not absolutely certain so am open to correction if anyone knows better.
The other thing that fogged my memory is that Elizabeth's husband cheated on her. Had she been a nobody, it would have been between her, her husband, and the other woman. Elizabeth, in fact, learned about the betrayal two months before We, the People did. But once we did know, she had to 'fess up about her feelings, first on a blog (on which she stood by her husband), then on Oprah (on which she wavered a bit), and finally in her best-selling book Resilience (in which she admitted throwing up upon finding about her husband's affair). You may argue that no one forced her to tell us about all of this, and that she made some money off it to boot (some of which I imagine went toward paying doctors' bills), but I suspect had the story not broke, she would have kept her feelings to herself. That's not to say there wouldn't have been a divorce, but that all we would have known is that it was because of "irreconcilable differences."
through your grace you have carried me
So, soon, there will be not just one but two of me ;). Any new parent knows how much I wish that were true!
And we are tired, oh so tired, of this art form still being stuck in the dark ages, with pushback from the CEO's and CIO's and the corporate who want the status quo to continue, who want to release the SAME game over and over every year for maximum profits and no risk.
Rob Coombes – keyboards
How will it get worse? Our politicians may grant amnesty to that 15-20 million which will encourage millions more. There are so many legal aliens that they hide more illegal aliens via ‘ethnic sympathy’. But what they bring us is as dangerous as any armed invasion.
As the Tharil empire and dominion crumbled, the Human species began to exploit their former masters in a continuing cycle of oppression. The Tharils now became the slaves, used as forced navigators of the time winds and traded as rare and valuable commodities. Ships such as the Privateer under Rorvik which became moored in the Gateway were built of the dense dwarf star alloy to prevent the Tharils escaping. When Rorvik’s privateer became stuck in the Gateway the Doctor and Romana befriended two Tharils, Biroc and Lazlo, and they explained the history of the Tharil race to them. The two Time Lords helped to free Tharils still trapped in the privateer. Romana stayed behind in the Gateway to help the Tharils build a new life based on freedom and equity.
This did it. The drunk swung around in his seat and hollered “SHUT UP! SHUT THE FUCK UP!” Still – and you have to give the man credit for this – he managed to sound like Christopher Lee playing a particularly unhinged villain.
asked me for a clue about what year it was. I said: it was a historical year for the category. He said 1974 (I have no idea why); to me, it was an easy clue: as you might know, 1972 is the first and ONLY time two African-American actresses competed for Best Actress. As always with a draw, I am somewhere in the middle on the excitement factor. This certainly is an unusual line-up: I haven’t seen any of the drama actresses, but two black actresses and a Swedish one, plus a loud cabaret performance and an unusual highly-criticized comedy role – not Oscar’s regular line-up, for sure. I have only seen Cabaret and Travels with My Aunt, though none recently. I’m very excited about The Emigrants, which I’ll probably save for last.
A: I think a grand old Charleston home would be ideal - I’m picturing both the ceremony and reception taking place outside; the ceremony would be at dusk, under huge trees, with garlands of white lights hung to illuminate the space.
Avari
My first stop was usually LinkedIn. Profiles on that website have sections for various forms of contact, plus links to the professional’s own websites or blog. And if you find a personal page, you’re done. Those will always have a “contact me” page with at least an email. Facebook is not as reliable, but sometimes if you click on the info page you’ll find their email listed. Twitter accounts are only good for checking if the person has a personal website in their bio. For some companies who didn’t even list writers or have article bylines, I resorted to scanning, or searching “writer” with ctrl + F, the list of who the company was following on Twitter and found a name that way.
With manga, I will forgive a lot of the art missteps and rough-around-the-edgesness that a lot of newer artists or lesser known groups make. After all, I’m more of a lyrics girl. Breathtaking art and pretty, pretty boys are nice, but I’m really here for the story. It’s a lot harder with anime, because while you’re listening to the words, your main focus is the art. And if the art is clunky or backgrounds treated as an afterthought, it becomes harder and harder not to turn into that nitpicky chick in the back that everyone throws their Calpis bottles at during DVD number 195 of Ranma 1/2.
3 small red beets sliced thin with a mandolin
As I approach the school parking lot, I see the sign: “No Busses.” Guess the administrators don’t want Mom kissing Johnny goodbye when she drops him off in the morning. And after Mom drives away, they don’t want Johnny sneaking a peck with Jenny.
It will be a tough one.
“Do not dwell in the past, do not dream of the future, concentrate the mind on the present moment.”-unknown
Mistie Jordan I have a small circle of friends/artists whose blogs I visit regularly. We upload pictures and comment on each others work and progress, and since I live in a very small town with little in the way of an art outlet, this is really helpful to me. In particular, I love Jessie Marianiello’s blog and website. She is a total inspiration and shares so much of her life and work. She is a beautiful person. http://straydogarts.com
hand with tipping. Why can’t they just tell you how much they want from the get go!?! It’s like an unfriendly surprise when the 99cent soda ends up being $1.07 and you just do not have those extra 8cents on hand!!!
I know of no other way to become a grateful child of my Heavenly Father than to consciously consider the goodness He fills my days with. Unacknowledged blessings do nothing for the soul -- but gifts joyfully, humbly received causes the heart to draw nearer.
Fareda: For the past few nights, father’s soldiers Uncho, Ragheb and Haamid have been coming to our house and I have been secretly listening to their conversations.
In that spirit, let me add to the mentions of shale.
You make me want to make a difference in my life, and in yours. You make me want to hold onto all these little pieces of happiness that I’ve collected with time, and throw them like confetti around me, so that I can bask in their bright colours and residue sunshine. You make me want to hold onto my smile a little longer, when it would have slipped away from the visage seconds earlier.
A key member of India’s Planning Council, Dr. Kirit Parikh, is reportedly pushing for this idea as “a broad strategic vision”. I disagree with Dr. Parikh because China is not known for respecting riparian rights on international rivers. On the contrary, I think his words would only give more excuse for China to push ahead with their plans.
Flavor: First impression is a refreshing sensation that carries with it a combination of quick grain sweetness chased by an equally fast moving spike of hops (that slightly metallic, slightly astringent sensation). The second sip again begins with that refreshing sensation followed by more of the hop spikes leading the sweeter grain this time. A third sip notices how well behaved these two flavors are. No fighting for prominence or domination.
By decreasing the field, you would minimise the risk of falling and maximise the chances of more runners finishing. In theory, this should lead to a safer spectacle without taking away the unique experience of the National.
Amid the gasps from dumbfounded open mouths the recently declared bankrupt Mrs Lumby thanked the room for their generosity!
Hapa SF reminds Off the Grid 5M happening soon! 11-2pm at 5th and Minna in the Chronicle Building underpass. See you there!
It's a blog.
‘Cos being remembered is everything. If you die and nobody remembers you, well, that’s like you never existed. You were there but you were like dark matter... just holding the bright stars in their place. But if your name is still on people’s lips, still being bandied around backstreet pubs and used as a gross insult in the playground then you have at least achieved some kind or immortality. Future generations will carry your name forth like some kind of socio-biological seed and who knows? You may yet influence the children of tomorrow in some weirdly perverse manner which will either raise humankind to the heights of enlightenment or (more likely) see it damned to the lowest circle of hell.
“Always in motion is the future.” ~Yoda
Teri jaan ke sadke mein kuchh aaisa kar jaaun
I did, however finish the bird mobile, so at least I did something this week. It’s currently hanging on our kitchen light until I can relocate it to its permanent place in the nursery (above the changing table).
Shopping at Proteus Gowanus is intellectually stimulating, likely to result in conversation and often amusing.
These were in my hot little hands just 3 days after ordering...
The specs are not really ground breaking but we are all curious on what Samsung is up to after the massive build of anticipation for the device. And we think that this device will be the most innovative and revolutionary device from Samsung so far. Or we just hope it will be. So never miss a bit of it by following the full broadcast of the event here.
Beat in the cheese until smooth. Then beat in the double cream until thick. (You may like to add a little more sifted icing sugar to get the consistency you like for piping on the cakes.)
Sent by Salon.com to cover a political event in Iowa, Savage was so angered by a conservative Republican politician Gary Bauer’s opposition to same-sex marriage that he volunteered for Bauer’s campaign. He spent his time there smearing his flu-infected saliva on any surface he thought Bauer might touch. Interviewed in 2006 by a student newspaper about political candidate Carl Romanelli, Savage stated that “Romanelli should be dragged behind a pickup truck until there’s nothing left but the rope”.
I've received two invitations for exhibitions later in the year, one in June and one in September. In some ways I'm a little hesitant in taking up the challenge again, since the last three weren't all that succesful financially and I lost a modest amount in the process. On the other hand I've gained a lot of experience and some valuable insights which I may want to use in a next exhibition, but I'll need to think things through for a while. I've still got some time before I need to make definite decisions, useful but somewhat unsettling unfortunately.
But, let us grant for the moment that the person independently verifying another man’s faith is seeking only that man’s good and has attained superior knowledge. Even then we are in no better position. A government official who shows me the best way to conduct a business, may, upon my failure, shore up my losses and provide security for me. But, there is no security for the life to come that can be given by another man. It is not within another man’s power to ease my loss, or prevent my suffering, or restore me in some measure. That is a matter between God and myself. The Kingdom of God is in the hearts of men (Luke 17:21) and therefore no man, who’s only real jurisdiction is in the physical world, can affect a better care than I of my soul by use of superior knowledge, or outward force, or coercion.
1 continent
Stephen King's On Writing -- While my writing leans toward the scary, thriller genre, this was a no brainer for me to read. But I recommend this book to any writer of any genre. King not only gives a look into his own writing style (the when, the where and the how), but he also offers short, easy, do-able ways of getting your story out. He doesn't give lofty, convoluted exercises that only MFA graduates can handle. He gives you manageable tasks: for instance, he describes his way of plotting as putting "a group of characters in some sort of predicament and then watch them try to work themselves free." Plus, any insight into the master of the horror genre is guaranteed to be a thrilling read.
I was quite impressed with the quality of the game when it arrived. For the low price of $14.95, the whole product is well made and sturdy. The game-board is beautifully illustrated, and made of thick durable material. We were also able to pull out the Emotions Definition Cards and use them in a ABA program. Then when we were done that program for the day, my son's tutors would pull out and play the game as a reward. Even the box the game comes in is strong and won't break after a couple of uses like most board games now a days.
When I walked into his room a few minutes later, he looked up from his children's Bible, pointed at the picture and said,
To this day, none of this research has been made public. This is a clear example of how corporate greed has bought our government, instead of providing this information for the benefit of ALL mankind. They have deliberately hidden it from public view in order to prop up corporations such as the oil, natural gas, coal, and nuclear power industries.
Proud parents.
Creation science journals for years have produce quite an a lot of data on the formation of the Grand Canyon and have advocated rapid formation caused by a flood. For years secular scientists denied it, claiming that the Canyon was carved out slowly over a vast period of time and anything that questioned it was religion not science. Instead of clinging to more complexity in their ‘theory”, they accepted evidence this time as reported in physorg…
"When two of the most innovative groups in heavy music today — Chicago-based avant-garde trio Locrian and Seattle art/drone duo Mamiffer — announced they were teaming up for a studio collaboration, the resulting album, Bless Them That Curse You (Profound Lore/SIGE/Utech), quickly became one of the earliest “most-anticipated” releases of 2012 among fans of experimental and extreme music.
Anyway, every time I go to Andy's Market there is a plethora of folks in their golden years navigating the aisles and who mysteriously seem to flock to me like bees to honey which I think has less to do with my personal charm, and more to do with the fact that I'm nearly 6 feet tall and I can reach all those rows of tofu sausages on the top shelf that are so popular in vegetarian communities.
Much of my time the past week has been devoted to trying to stop a blogger who has been downloading my watermarked images from Google searches, erasing my watermark and my signature and then distributing in her various blogs, livejournal and Picasa accounts. She takes them down in one spot, then I find them in another.
Enjoy the rest of the looong break! Be safe.
Then, I removed the blue covers from the cushions (which just sit in the chair form, aren't snapped, banded, or otherwise actually attached to the frame) and laid them out on my wrong side up polka dot fabric.
Gloria has, so far, started to stitch around her cabochon using delicas that mimic it's colours - but she's not convinced that she likes the result. Gloria will be doing a little bit more during May, so we'll see how she gets on - watch this space.
When you finish the interview, put your notebook or recorder away and have an informal chat. As well as being polite and leaving a good impression, you might be surprised at what additional information flows when the subject thinks it’s all over and is more relaxed.
My third favorite single of April is definitely a song/moment of epic proportions! “Only The Horses” is the first official single from the upcoming 4th studio album from one of my all-time favorite artists, and the artists behind my favorite album of all-time, Scissor Sisters! Scissor Sisters have never released a single thing that I have been disappointed in and that is still the case with the release of “Only The Horses.” In fact, it is quite the opposite. My mind was completely blown when I heard this song, almost moreso than any of the first singles from any of their records, although it’s really difficult to say considering I have been pretty ecstatic every time I have heard the first single from one of their records. I just can’t express enough the love I have for Scissor Sisters. They are absolutely amazing. So, instead, I will speak of this song as an individual track. The sound is probably the most “dance” thing they have done in their career, aside from maybe the promo single they released in January, “Shady Love,” which kind of implies that this is going to be the sound of their upcoming record. This song kind of sweeps over you, in a way, and it kind of reminds me of taking flight, the way the song builds up effortlessly and brings you back down with just as much ease. The lyrics are also beautiful, using beautiful imagery to describe the act of just escaping from your life for a while to just be with somebody that you love. It’s an absolutely gorgeous song that I really think EVERYBODY needs to know!
2012 noses
Of course the Easter merchandise bombards you as soon as you walk in the door and I did have to walk around a bit before I could find the Jewish food section. But it was there. And it was decently stocked. Just as are we Jews on the island of Oahu.
A labor of love.
I feel boundless.
We make sure everyone sees your true side!
What you will win:
Today is my firstborn’s twentieth birthday. Strange that when one beautiful relationship was blossoming another was crumbling like a house of cards. Sometimes I wonder what is this strange relationship I share with my boys. They are my sons, best friends, confidante and much more. There is a much deeper bond that connects us where age is no bar. I think despite of all the blows that life gave the journey was one hell of a crazy fun trip with both. Trust me raising two brats is not for weak hearted. I have had my share of tears and laughter. You can browse through all the posts about my mind-blowing brats and me Here
Do I have to get up at 4am? In the pouring rain? To pull tyres attached to chains around my neck?
One downside of a (very) mild winter: it never got cold enough to kill off the bugs. I've already seen a few mosquitoes and just this week have found two ticks (one on some sheets near the floor, one on Stella)! I hate ticks. I might hate them more than spiders. At least spiders don't try to attach to me and suck my blood. So gross.
Hampton Haze stood above Rea Valley, with the hills of Shropshire in front of it - including the rocky Stiperstones - and Wales at its back door. It caught all weathers, which was why, left to its own devices, it so easily fell into disrepair. But built on the sunrise flanks of the Long Mountain, it also caught all the good views. In the morning, more likely than not, you’d find the valley full of mist but Hampton Haze alive with sunlight, an island in a sea of white. And there’d be sunrises to die for, the sky turned orange and magenta in zebra stripes. The house stood so high above the valley that planes and helicopters would fly beneath it, and there would be days when you could see so far that you’d have been forgiven for thinking you were flying yourself.
Angelo Esposito might not be seen as much of a top prospect nowadays in the eyes of some but back in 2007 he had it going for him; as an admirable 20th overall pick in the Entry Draft by the Penguins, Esposito had a bright future ahead so it seemed.
That's the challenge the GOP establishment faces--attracting Ron Paul supporters to support the liberal Republican Romney. I know I won't be casting a vote for Romney in 2012. It will be the first time I haven't voted for the Republican candidate, even though I wasn't voting for John McCain until Sarah Palin came along for the ride.
Since our last post, Jackson has continued to amaze us on a daily basis. He is such a smart, smart boy. Some of his favorite things are football, playing basketball with his little tikes basketball net (which he's quite good at I might add), climbing the stairs ha ha, playing in his ball pit which he got from grandma and grandpa porter for his birthday, brushing his teeth, playing with the dogs, turning light switches on and off, opening doors, fans (oh how he LOVES fans), and reading. It took him a while to really get into books, and now he loves them. But not being read to (unless PopPop smith is doing the reading). He likes to read the books himself and point at all the pictures to have you tell him what each picture is. And more recently he's started picking up books and "singing" the abc's, as if that is what's written in the book. Only the abc song that he sings sounds more like "d,c,d,c". It's definitely very cute.
May 8, 2012, 11:00 am CDT
Includes letters from Kristen that share messages she wishes someone would have told her—when she was depressed and struggling with loss, shame from sexual abuse, and suicidal thoughts.
[16] Note that in Colombo District, as distinct from the amorphous concept of “Greater Colombo,” the population of Tamils in 2001 was 12.2 per cent, having increased from11.2 %
Sheffield’s Botanical Gardens officially opened in 1836. The following year Charles Dickens began work on ‘Oliver Twist’. We feel this makes the Botanical Gardens a perfect place to celebrate our City Read. So that’s what we’re going to do…
Hubby and I are planning a trip to N.Z. in February, stopping off at Oatlands this week on the way home we popped into Oatlands hand made and I just couldn't resist this satchel to take away with me. It is made by madeit.com.au/stalley
Messe Noir 7" (Reaper Records)
Worn by the character Pola Debevoise in ‘How to Marry a Millionaire‘ in a fashion show scene. She looks an absolute Goddess in this scene- Marilyn at her finest.
I was delighted and I went out and bought lots of clothes for baby girls. When I found that I had a boy again, I wept. But then the cherub was such a delight that I gave all my love to him. Still I had to dress him in frocks and other girl clothes for sometime, to my mother-in-law’s irritation. But I had fulfilled my little desire.
In marketing the watch service, Heinze has been hit with mixed responses. While Heinez's more sophisticated clients have appreciated that, as an outside lawyer, he has taken an active interest in their businesses, other clients shy away from the extra information.
Blk 128 Toa Payoh Lorong 1
Before life takes us to Turkey, we decide to take a family vacation to Washington State -- a place we hope to buy land in one day. You can see my big boot here as I recover from my triathlon-induced injuries. What a beautiful week.
The world’s first smartphone with a dual-core proccesor – a 1 GHz Nvidia Tegra 2 – also features a 4-inch WVGA screen, 8 GB of memory (expandable up to 32 GB via microSD memory cards), a 1,500 mAh battery, a 8-megapixel rear camera with 1080p recording capabilities and a 1.3-megapixel front camera for video calls.
the twilight’s last gleaming?
This post really goes hand in hand with the last one on woman's cloth. A few years ago - probably around 4 - I started to occasionally have my periods at shorter intervals. I was introduced to Susun Weed's book, "The Wise Woman Way, Healing Wise". I borrowed the book from a friend, skimmed through it and read the pertinent parts. I started to make nettle infusions and to drink them on a regular basis. My menstruation irregularities disappeared. Now an infusion, as some of you may know and some of you may not, is not tea. Using 1/2 cup of dried nettle per litre or quart, you pour boiling water over the dried nettle and immediately put a lid on the jar or glass container you are using and let it sit for 4 hours. Then you strain and drink.
You know what sexism is? Sexism is refusing to ask a woman candidate hard questions for fear that she might not be up to the task of answering them. For giving her "space" to answer only the questions that she has been prepped for beforehand. For not questioning her associates and her judgement, even if it relates to her family. For not going after her for drawing obvious blanks when asked even EASY questions--for the record, I read The New Yorker, the Statesman, the Chronicle, CNN, BBC, Huff Post, and a few others. For not saying, "that's a beauty queen answer, Sarah, please give me some specifics."
Healing in the name of Jesus
Everyone must know that I’m rooting hard for Dr. Ron Paul in 2012. Dr. Paul has a way of making sense to both Democrats, Republicans, and Independents. There are many reasons for this and I encourage you to ask me about it.
My Neighbour Totoro was actually the first Studio Ghibli film I ever watched and as a child it blew my mind! I had it on VHS and watched it all the time. I was amazed by the idea that in any back garden there could a passage that would lead you to a giant secret friend! Having watched it recently, its amazing to see how little its aged as a film (it was released in 1988!) and its still extremely fun to watch!
And explains the Universe,
Something’s hinder geocache searches, i.e. muggles, non geocache searching humans to most of you, so items hidden in town when there is a weekly market on, is a no-no and you are best coming back another day if possible.
So. I have developed a plan of action (of sorts). I have made the decision to go ahead and join the local gym. I think I can just about afford that luxury for myself. And I will seriously throw myself back into a proper training regime. I would love to get back to some running too, but will see how it goes on the treadmill for a while, taking it very slowly. I still don't trust these shins.
…serious analysts now argue that fiscal austerity in a depressed economy is probably self-defeating: by shrinking the economy and hurting long-term revenue, austerity probably makes the debt outlook worse rather than better.
Birth Certificate blanks filled in.
The Presentation
Tasty Mediterranean Green Beans
SARAH MCLACHLAN
Her tall willowy physique made it harder for her to complete some of the skills.
It is a rare occasion when the title of a book not only hints at the plot but perfectly describes the stylistic tone as well. The Rules of Civility is just such a book and it is a grand first effort for author Amor Towles.
A defense for Noah!
Just came back to London yesterday and discovered that the weather is not as it was expected. While I spent some semi-sunny times in Zürs/Lech and Salzburg (more sunny times over there), I thought that at least my city would be in some spring-mood. But no. Gatwick Airport welcomed me with heavy rain and luggage that gained approximately another 20 kg after I sent it off, which let me change my clothes the moment I entered my four walls (as I once said - leaving the tube & feeling as I just left the rain forest behind).
Once the pastry is read place it on the plate, top with the figs (removed from syrup), cream, almonds then drizzle the rest of the syrup over the top. If the syrup is very runny just simmer it with the lid of for a short time until it begins to thicken.
Seriously one of the most amazing things I've ever eaten. And a huge improvement on my previous Tomato Pie recipe. It also reheats beautifully.
Brasserie Duyck Jenlain Blonde
So, since I’m so far behind I’m going to do a bit of a recap on what I learned in March and then I’m going to try to keep you updated more regularly. I don’t think you need to hear about every meeting, since not every meeting is worth reporting on, but here are some highlights.
for bad men) to keep us there,
The follow up to WHERE THE BODIES ARE BURIED will be called WHEN THE DEVIL DRIVES and will be out next summer. Winning the Wodehouse prize was the least comfortable Brookmyre has ever felt professionally as he had to do a photo shoot with a very rare breed of pig that had its own escort. The pig wouldn't come out of its trailer (Hollywood style huff) and sent its piglets instead. Carrying a large jeroboam of champagne and surrounded by tiny pigs, Brookmyre said he looked like a hobbit. He's also writing a sci-fi/computer gaming novel called BEDLAM which allows him to make up a complete universe.
Betsy and I got back home from northern Georgia late yesterday afternoon. We had good but warm weather, did some hiking, and saw some neat waterfalls. We also had a fabulous anniversary dinner on Tuesday evening.
If you came looking for the YA Scavenger Hunt, I am afraid to tell you that it is now closed. The winner of my personal giveaway will be announced some time in the next couple of days. Those who participated in the hunt, I hope you had a grand time. I hope you also enjoyed the alternate ending to THE LOST SAINT.
Share 45 things about yourself: If you opened this, copy it and paste it into your own note - FILL IT OUT!!! Learn 45 things about your friends, and let them learn 45 things about you!
Place corn flakes in a food processor and pulse until they are fine crumbs. Mix corn flakes, bread crumbs and ranch in a medium-sized bowl.
So, lo-and-behold, I came to become a blogger. There's the social interaction that I had been lacking for the longest time. Almost everyone, save for the rare troll and flamer, has been genuinely positive. This outlet gives me opportunity to flex my friending muscle without all of the risks that come with physical befriending. You are my best friend. I do not joke when I say that.
The white population of the city would flee for the suburbs, leaving the remaining Black population in political control of the city’s destiny.
Many hugs....
Do not let your heart rot in loneliness like mine,
Mom came down from Wisconsin for the weekend! With her visit, I knew I needed to have my walking shoes ready because we were going to explore the city. I also did a little research to find local restaurants that may be tucked away in neighborhoods and off the beaten track.
I have been really interested in the works by Shrin Neshat – research to her work can be found on my blog here I hand painted the design and then projected this over the female in the image. This was designed to bring the photographer forward into the image, which is the basis of my project.
It is the same with Confession – a soul that has perfect contrition already receives absolution before attending Confession. Of course, the soul must go at the earliest available opportunity. Hence we can see that a desire for the grace can indeed give us that grace.
When I took C++ two years ago I remember this being a bit confusing at first and in particular I couldn’t see the benefit initially. Since that time I’ve become a frequent user of assignment operators and find them easy to understand and a way to save keystrokes.
When he met Fakhra, Bilal Khar had already been married and divorced three times. He was married at the time to a fourth wife with whom he had two children, facts of which Fakhra was unaware. Under Islamic law, a Muslim may have up to four wives at one time.
I’m impressed at how coherent most of the responses were. I know I was practically frothing at the mouth and it was evident that many others were as well. But we kept it together and presented civil feedback. Most of the devs’ responses had to do with “work in progress” and “expected redesign of Holy Nova, we just don’t know how yet.”
While the whole world walks by
We went to a local lake park and just about froze our tushies off but had a great time! We started here and then came back to the house for some shots in the nursery. Since I'm very self-conscious I didn't do many shots with my bare belly but we did get a couple that I feel comfortable sharing but don't laugh at my flat belly button! haha!
Your eyes are deep and heart of gold.
Tanner had grown his own mutton-chop sideburns to play Dr. John Watson in the "Sherlock Homes" play that opened April 17. Performances were canceled yesterday. Tanner also loved to build eye-popping sets. "Most would call him a genius," Town & Gown's statement said.
Find your bed!
Full Moon April 6th at 17 degrees Libra, New Moon April 21st at 1 degree of Taurus sextile Neptune and trine Mars, Mercury goes direct at April 4th at 23 degrees of Pisces, Mars goes direct on April 14th at 3 degrees of Virgo square Neptune and is trine Pluto on May 16th, Pluto goes retrograde at 9 degrees of Capricorn on April 10th, Venus goes into Gemini on April 4th (that goes retrograde May 15th, direct on June 27th staying in the sign until August 7th), Mercury goes over Uranus and is square Pluto between April 22nd and the 26th.
explain the merits of the law
It is good story and easy to read for me.
Bush Radio management has always received good feedback for Belinda’s pleasant and professional telephone manner.
by Joe Sacco, 2000
We need to first be free
Especially in the unexpected life.
Open Monday to Friday 12noon to 12midnight
Exsqueeze me? I baking powder? Why didn't you CALL ME?
What’s your bounce factor? When you get knocked down do you get up and carry on? Or do you take a moment, maybe longer, to feel the hit before carrying on?
Att 32 (h/c)
Honey for glazing
I don’t write the stories. God writes the stories. I just take the dictation.
1.) A child is left alone in the game room and is getting overly territorial with the toys they are playing with - they won't allow others to play with anything they have, and react angrily or violently when other kids question them.
I never thought much about military types and when I did, it was not good. My assumption was that they were less intelligent than I was and far more prone to senseless violence. My parent’s moderate social and environmental activism had inadvertently bred in me the idea I was above war-like behavior despite the fact that my father had served in the army himself before going to college.
Amber stilled when he reached inside his long black coat and pulled out a knife. Her eyes went round and her heart raced, fear thundering in her veins.
Finally we have Pink Peace. This is the rose that looks least like its ancestors, but is probably the most fragrant of the family.
Nikenjayamochi Kadoya Honten Co. / Beer Warehouse Ise Kadoya IPA
“Besides considerable strength in Moscow, perhaps even an actual majority, the Opposition had managed to capture Party organisations in Ryazan, Penza, Kaluga, Simbirsk and Chelyabinsk. The Opposition’s strength in these provincial towns was plausibly attributed to there being, in those centres, a predominance of Party officials transferred as a reprisal for their dissident opinions. In Moscow the strength of the Opposition lay in the State administration (particularly in economic bodies), and student cells. The opposition was comparatively weak amongst the working class. No doubt this was partly a result of the past record of various members of the Opposition on questions of industrial management, and also partly because questions of immediate working class interest, such as wages, were not given any prominence. Whatever the reasons, in Moscow, at a time when it was gaining majorities among the students, the Opposition could only win 67 out of 346 cells of industrial workers.” (p47)
Born on May 25, 1953, Bailey was bred for the jump game as his father Ken was also a successful handler. Bailey currently trains at Thorndale Farm, Andoversford, Gloucestershire, having relocated from his native Northamptonshire in the summer of 2006, while he began his training career at Old Manor Stables in Upper Lambourn. Following a low-profile riding career, he served as assistant to Humphrey Cottrill, Tim Forster and Fred Rimell, before recording his first win as a trainer with Shifting Gold on January 7, 1978, at Sandown in the Anthony Mildmay Chase, a mere six days after taking over the reins from his father. He has trained some top-class jumpers who have rewarded him with training’s highest accolades, notably the Grand National (Mr Frisk, 1990), Cheltenham Gold Cup (Master Oats, 1995) and Champion Hurdle (Alderbrook, 1995). Indeed, Bailey is the only current trainer to have won those three races. He has his own website, (www.kimbaileyracing.com), where he publishes a popular blog. John Smith’s Grand National Record: 1983 Menford (Refused 19th); 1986 Late Night Extra (PU 11th); 1990 MR FRISK (WON); 1991 Docklands Express (Fell 1st), Mr Frisk (PU 22nd); 1992 Docklands Express (4th); 1994 Master Oats (Fell 13th); 1995 Romany King (6th), Master Oats (7th); 1996 Over The Stream (13th); 1997
I’m the kind of person who wonders if a million coincidences does, actually, a movie make (Forest Gump) – or more precisely, a good movie make – and who appreciates that the heart wants what it wants (The Human Centipede).
None of them were asked if we wanted to pay this debt or if we could. As far as this government has been concerned, the debt and austerity plan are ‘manageable’.
Take risks and face your fears.
The woman was married to defendant Robert McClain, a former Los Angeles County sheriff’s deputy, and pretended to castrate her 23-year-old boyfriend as the husband watched, prosecutors previously said.
Inner Dialogue: You can’t do that Kate. You have already gained some weight besides you’ve never had a McFlurry why would you want one now? Don’t ruin your track record.
and how fun is that our medalists are from all around the world!? i love the global spirit of handmaking!
9. In Your Eyes 8:29
Colin Stair, who runs Stair Galleries, an auction house in Hudson, N.Y., is one competitor who has congratulated Mr. Keno. The trade, Mr. Stair said, will monitor the new venture’s progress and turn out for the Stamford event. “I’ve rearranged my May sales so I can go check it out in person,” Mr. Stair said. But he would caution anyone who, like Mr. Keno, starts an auction house in midcareer, maneuvering hundreds of objects through hotels-turned-salerooms at razor-thin profit margins. “You have to be prepared for an initial bloodletting until you catch on,” Mr. Stair said."
tents are safe.
Baird Jubilation Ale - If figs were a delicacy in Biblical times, then Baird Jubilation Ale might be a special beer for Jesus to crack open after a long day of preaching, telling parables and cleansing temples of corrupt money changers. Brewed with candied figs and spiced with cinnamon, this Japanese beer would make Christ take a drink and say "For the love of Dad, this is good!" On a related (but not really that related) note, apparently Jesus Christ's tomb is in Japan.
There is a challenge a young lady named Brittani in a youtube video offered to everyone who wants to have a happy life. Write down in a journal or notebook the things that you want or something positive about your life everyday, try to fill up one whole page and the positivity in your life will flow! Check out her video below!
Happy New Year to all of you! And with a New Year there comes tons of new challenges for you all. But, before we get started I want to let you all know that we have made two changes for the challenges. The first one being that in order for your submission to be entered in a drawing for the prizes offered you must have everything for that challenge included in your work. Entries that don't have the required elements will not be entered. Also, we decided to do away with the Top 3 picks and add another prize. However, in order to have a chance to win the second prize we require you to use one of our images from our store including the elements for that challenge. So, that means we will have two prizes for each challenge. One is from the Sponsor and the Second one is only if your project is using one of our images. Last but not least all winners will be posted under our winner tab under our logo. So, if you want to see who won the last challenge please click on the tab.
The major issue however with the Delhi High Court’s Samsung order was that it had been appealed and the Division Bench hearing the appeal had passed a series of orders during the course of the appeal, which by the way is still pending final arguments. While the importers tried to argue that the Samsung order had been stayed by the Division Bench, the ‘rights-holder’ tried to argue that the Division Bench had not yet stayed the operative part of the Samsung order.
Excerpts From A Love Circus (1996)
I didn’t reschedule. Not planning to go back.
I can't believe how big Brighton is getting, so mature, so...well "big"! I am so proud of him!
In one of the latest incidents, a tornado touched down about 75 miles east of Dallas near the E. Texas town of Edom, destroying/damaging at least 100 homes.
A “job centre” funded by money misappropriated from (British) tax-payers has been opened in Mali, and was the beginning of “free movement of people in Africa and the EU (Europe)”.
August 1: Special request. Throughout this song journey, I want ANY VIEWERS to put in their song requests. Not something by someone else, but something that you want made into a song. It can be lyrics, a melody you like that you want lyrics for, something from the instruments I listed, just something original that you want. I will choose the person and their idea on July 20, so that I have time to work on it along with the originals. So start posting your ideas now!! Nothing is stupid or weird. Let me know what you want me to do!
Hawaii: 20 votes; 80%
But as is obvious now, weeks later, 6 PM and 12 Midnight came in Jerusalem on May 21, and still nothing happened. This did not deter the forumites, however. Most still clung eventually to the thought that the “speculation” on the exact timing was just off. Surely the “right” time was actually at midnight at the END of May 21 at the LAST time zone before the International Dateline. After all, it was the date that was Guaranteed in the Bible… not the time of day. Or night.
So there we were. We'll call him "Bill"...looking over Cedar. It was a beautiful night. Bill goes to kiss me, and I completely turn away. First mistake-misleading. This will lead to upsetting the boy and lots of awkwardness.
How do you cook this?
Matthew uses this interesting wording:
‘Cause she’ll sink like a ship
So why hasn’t anyone heard of it until now? Why is it just now getting media attention? Well, you know, that completely and totally beats me. With so many doctors refusing to perform vasectomies on young men or men without children, you’d think they’d jump all over a form of birth control that’s highly effective and readily reversible. Well, two things come to mind when I think of this, and maybe I’m off my rocker but here it goes. One, this child-friendly world doesn’t want such a thing because breeding is “God’s will” or “natural” or whatever you want to say about that. Two, is that the men of the world are still extremely sexist and think that the responsibility of using contraception falls solely on women (which is completely and utterly repulsive).
“Yes, I find myself in the absurd position of a man who has reckoned without his host. I have made all my plans for going, and have had my hotel bill sent to me in pursuance of that idea, and now I discover that I not only haven’t money enough to pay it and get to Rome, but I haven’t much more than half enough to pay it. I have credit galore,” he said, trying to give the situation a touch of liveliness, “but the bank is shut.”
If you are not going to use the dough after the second rise, deflate it, wrap it airtight, and store it in the freezer. The dough can remain frozen for up to 1 month. Thaw the dough, still wrapped, in the refrigerator overnight and use it directly from the refrigerator.
This caused much sadness and consternation among many residents (this writer included) because of the way in which Pawn Shops ensnare lower income peoples in a negative cycle while the fast cash offered obscures those negatives.
Nick Drake - Pink Moon - 1972
I stamped images in SU! Handsome Hunter ink then colored each of the poinsettias with Copics. The JOY was stamped with Pure Poppy ink. Finished the centers of the flowers with MS gold glitter and sponged some Antique Linen distressed ink on the edges. Snippets of ribbon made an easy finishing touch.
I also grabbed my first Anejo tequila in the form of Milagro Anejo. This stuff is good. Much better than the silver tequila's I have had in the past and it kind of worries me that I will be seeking out solid Anejos even after this sale as they are always too pricey for me. At 30 bucks this bottle was a steal. When I got to the counter the checkout guy remarked that anyone not buying Anejo tequila was missing out at these prices, and I tend to agree.
His world has become so dark and still,
I better get going. I decided to have a small family picnic to get myself in the mood for the upcoming season. I invited just a few relatives over, and I noticed one big guy, way in the back that I don’t recognize. Wait a minute….. Is that Uncle Ben all alone back at the last picnic table? Maybe I should bring him a beer, and a few burgers. He really looks hungry.
Later, once I was already with wifesy for a while, Mom said, “Why don’t you just have sex with a guy, so you two can have a baby?”
I am entering this card into an Outlawz greeting card challenge:
1 straightened
““I glorified you on earth by finishing the work you gave me to do. now, father, glorify me alongside yourself. give me the same glory I had with you before the world existed. “I made your name known to the people you gave me out of the world. they were yours, you gave them to me, and they have kept your word. now they know that everything you have given me is from you, because the words you gave me I have given to them, and they have received them. they have really come to know that I came from you, and they have come to trust that you sent me. “I am praying for them. I am not praying for the world, but for those you have given to me, because they are yours. indeed, all I have is yours, and all you have is mine, and in them I have been glorified.” (John 17:4-10 CJB)
White Marriages (except the index is missing some of the marriages for Cisney and Chappell that I accidentally deleted – I’ll fix that a.s.a.p.)
Twenty five episodes really was not long enough for Chihayafuru; I am DESPERATELY hoping for a sequel here! The ‘ending’ was sudden and felt a little forced as a result, but that’s a minor flaw in an otherwise very strong series. With some of the best, most varied and well developed characters of its season, great animation and a superb mix of romance, drama and comedy, Chihayafuru should have been on everyone’s watching list over the past couple of seasons. If it wasn’t on yours, do yourself a favour and add it now!
I could go on and on and on about this ship, it was a fantastic experience. But this post is getting heavy on photos and I suspect a lot of you have given up by now anyway, muttering about Aunt Maudes' Slideshow Nights, so if you want to know more, you can click here.
NYX cream Blush in Hot Pink
I wish you a year of good fortune!
I had planned an afternoon of boating and lawn-tennis today but it would seem I must cancel and retire to my bed. I do hope the maid isn't similarly indisposed: I'm buggered if she's getting off lightly with the laundry.
Timestamp: 2011-04-08 17:11:28 UTC
* Materials: various biological compounds from Biochem, high-end mats from Diplomacy.
I like neurology. A lot. I will tell people more than they ever wanted to know about how brains work. I'm pretty into the physics of gymnastics as well, and I'm active in the neurodiversity movement. I was into genetics as well until a prof kind of ruined it for me; I'll be cool with it again in six months or so.
After a visit so the Sunday market in Coustellet we walked from home to Villars (abt 4 kms) to earn our lunch.
Organic Romain Lettuce
Goals of the school library
The biggest shock was poor Margot, our favourite hen (don't tell the others). She was absolutely beautiful and was found dead one morning in their eglu nest box...
has brought you here
This week I'm sharing a new book I just bought! For those of you that watch the Real Housewives of Beverly Hills you may recognize Lisa Vanderpump. The Real Housewives shows on Bravo are a guilty pleasure of mine! My favorites are the California shows (Beverly Hills and Orange Country). Lisa is my absolute favorite housewife on all the shows! I love her style! I still can't believe she's my age! Oh...how I would love to look like that!!!
And today, as I left them for work, Mikhail wailed on top of his lungs, begging me to take him along too. But as he has slight fever, tak nak la bawak. Kang makin teruk pulak. Better he stays at home and rest.
and orison, the voice of its winds.
As much as I would enjoy writing a post about The Hobbit, this is actually my annual post on my experiences at the Illinois Teen Institute just a couple of weeks ago. While some who read this blog are surely familiar with it, I am going to assume that there are at least a few visitors who may not know. So before I get into ITI 2011, let me give a brief recap:
So, I committed to it. Certainly I don't need another striped shirt, but the curved collar, the shirttail hem, the 3/4 sleeves, and oh yes, the fact that it's by Margaret Howell, proved powerfully persuasive.
With that he hauled me off the bed without an ounce of foreplay and we had a quick fuck somewhere I won’t mention. He left me on the bathroom counter (oops, I mentioned) and went to bed without so much of a cuddle and being awfully proud of himself. An hour later he was reaching for my hand.
We needed a plan,
E.) Maasai people of Kenya/North Tanzania
I am no longer updating SurvivalPrep.net as I am choosing to move on to a much more narrowly focused set of activities pertaining to personal and community preparedness for hard times. Over the next couple of weeks I will be transferring the content from the old blog host to this site and will continue to monitor and post responses to the archived posts, but no new content will be posted here. I will add a few sites to the blogroll on here at some point, but other than that I've posted all that I feel qualified to post--food storage is my "specialty," and I think I've given everyone plenty of information to get started and keep going, and now I need to shift my focus to other activities besides coming up with new topics to write about. For those of you who are also passionate about food storage, I'd suggest bookmarking StockingUp.net and keep checking back there.
"He was coming to the belief which was soon to dominate his life -- that the existing order must be overthrown by an elite of revolutionaries acting in the name of the people".
When it comes to a busy homeschooling life Skwirk has certainly helped in ensuring we are covering a wide variety of topics within a small amount of time.
Brewers in 1987. Paciorek teaches at a school in California and has four sons
Monster WC. Bescherming van het moederschap : onderzoek naar de regelgeving inzake zwangerschap, bevalling en arbeid. Ars Aequi Libri; Nijmegen : 1995: 1-386.
Daylight streamed through the windows and consciousness slowly crept into our minds as we rocked gently towards Bangkok. From 7am onwards hawkers walked through the carriage announcing their wares loudly – coffee, rice, crackers and a whole host of other goodies.
To join me in supporting the responsible, effective, awesome work being done by the Young Women’s Leadership Network, click here.
I knew I felt really good today and wasn't quite sure why. I had a good run yesterday and another great run today, but it was more than that...I have been eating great, except for a few slip ups on Superbowl Sunday, whoops! My jeans felt better this morning, so I thought why not step on the scale and see what's going on...and to my surprise-WEIGHT LOSS! As for the challenge, I really find it to be simple and easy to follow! I have really been focused on the family meals to make sure we're all staying on track with putting healthy foods into our bodies. I think we're all human and have times where we fall short of super healthy eating? But I must say that this challenge has reminded me of the importance of healthy living ...and I am feeding a husband and two boys and am responsible for their health too! I am very happy with this challenge and here's hoping that scale keeps on dropping! Woohoo!
“A catastrophe! What we need is a catastrophe! An earthquake, a flood, or better yet: a train wreck. A forest fire, perhaps? The California forests are burning all the time. Nothing ever happens in this godforsaken Hunsrück!
2. Push Ups – 9
A big jar/can of sauerkraut, that is shredded finely, drained
as you read this we are … phasing you out. You cannot turn back
One of the highlights of the True the Vote conference was a speech by Artur Davis, who was a Democratic congressman from Alabama until last year. Davis has been an up-and-coming black Democratic leader, having been selected to second the nominationof Barack Obama at the 2008 Democratic convention in Denver.But in 2009 he decided to vote against Obamacare because he viewed it as unworkable and too expensive. When he ran the next year in the Democratic primary for governor in Alabama, he was attacked as disloyal and defeated by a coalition of liberals, teachers’ unions, and old-style black political machines.He told me that the voter suppression he most observed in his 68 percent African-American district was rampant fraud in counties with powerful political machines. To keep themselves in power, these machines would frequently steal the votes of members of minority groups. “I know it exists, I’ve had the chance to steal votes in my favor offered to me, and the people it hurts the most are the poor and those without power,” he said.
Brian Hennessey, 35, Ringoes, N.J.
I'll never be cured of this.
I haven't mentioned the Police Academy films yet, as so many of the Foundry street cops seem to be based upon characters from that series. That is certainly the case with the third figure in line, who passes a very close resemblance to the overly gung-ho Eugene Tackleberry. To be honest, he is too tall for an accurate representation of Tackleberry, so maybe you'd be better of using the name given to him by Foundry - Baker. The addition of the sunglasses is a nice touch.
I can't really think of a set off-hand that everyone seems to hate, but I like. But there are a few that are just plain ignored by the rest of the card community.
*Shaving Cream is another Home remedy or treatment for head louse
So, Aidan got to experience it with Daddy. And he was in awe. The "choo choo" was so much fun! (He looks very stern in these pictures, but he actually had a blast! Whenever he tries something new he has to take it all in before he reacts.)
But upon meeting my inter-dimensional traveler friend (note: this did not happen), the traveler cited the two “Incredible Hulk” TV movies as the start of this alternate “Avengers” film canon. 1988 and 1989′s “The Incredible Hulk Returns” and “The Trial of the Incredible Hulk” expanded the Marvel Universe considerably by introducing the Jade Giant to Thor (Eric Allan Kramer) and Daredevil (Rex Smith). And for any fan griping about Thor not wearing his trademark helmet in last year’s blockbuster, now you know that they already tried that and, oh man, did it not work.
Today a candidate merely needs to say he’s Pro-life and he has 70% of the evangelical vote.
It doesn't matter what they are reading as long as they read.
Philip Kingsley Elasticizer ($42.50)
After continuous experiments i didn’t know whether to have the laser or not so i continued playing, i also decided to add colour to the image to see if it would go well with the piece or not, i saved several versions here is how it it looks at the moment.
I am nowhere near as organised when it comes to the family happy snaps... I take plenty of them but they sit and gather memory on my computer...Sometimes I make online albums as a way of keeping them together but I am ashamed to admit not as often as I should. The real truth is that I prefer classic photograph albums... the old fashioned paper-with-hard-cover-style way of archiving pictures. There is something so comforting about flicking through albums... lounging around and reminiscing... sharing memories, laughing over how we looked and remembering when... It's just not the same hunched over a computer watching a slide show... So... that means this year I am printing the images that resonate and I am going to create 'real' albums...
This is not to say that I don't want expertise. I WANT expertise. If you know how to fix my computer, and can show me how, that's super awesome. In fact, if anyone out there knows how to fix a dryer which won't spin, PLEASE tell me!!
October 12: Your coordinator Saviya brings more live music with Fernan Cobian and dancing by Ritchie, Najma and others for another fabulous showcase. Rumor has it that this showcase will be Gothic-inspired....
If you have a weak stomach you may want to skip this post.
that rely on monthly FAAC
In his recent book, Out of the Ashes, David Lammy, MP for Tottenham, recalls telling the then Prime Minister, Gordon Brown about mothers from his constituency, feeling helpless to stop their sons getting caught up in the violence. "What are we doing for these women?" he asked the Prime Minister.
Nearly all of us are looking to the horizon and wonder how the economic and political climate will affect our lives. Some are battling the pain of physical illness or relational distress.
I am wondering...nothing, really. I'm so stuffed up.
And then it was bedtime. With no A/C or fans. Well, needless to say we didn't get any sleep that night and really appreciated the workers getting the power right back on when our alarm went off at 6:00 am. Argh, what a fiasco! I was just glad we got it back that day.
Irish warnings against misbehaving abound, such as “The road to Heaven is well signposted, but it’s badly lit at night.” Sweet sayings for lovers include “He who stares into the middle of a fire does be heavily in love” and “Where there is love, it’s easy to halve the potato.”
* I did not use melted butter in these waffles. I used 1/4 cup of canola oil and a couple extra Tablespoons of low fat buttermilk.
Howard’s new place at the table may mean his loyal fanbase could get even bigger. Boots observed people’s opinions change at the first show tapings. “I already talked to people before they’ve gone in talking about, ‘Oh, I don’t like Howard Stern,’ but after they come out they’re like, ‘I love the guy.’ To see that is great and I think that’s great for America, it’s great for Howard Stern and it’s great for ‘America’s Got Talent.’ “
Kathleen’s Father was a cattleman and her first job was hashing the neeps at five o’clock in the morning. She was 14 1/2 yrs old and it was 1944. She lived in the country in a place called Coalburn. She soon decided that she didn’t want to hash neeps anymore and got a job working at the bookshop at the railway station.
GC: Now to your career, I want to start out by asking you when you first realized you wanted to become an actor.
My kids are messy. They leave messes where ever they go. Their desks have papers all over them and under them. They have pencil sharpening shavings all over the floor. (Our custodian- that poor man- I'm positive he hates to clean our room.)
Music Liner Notes is sponsored by Two Guys From Brooklyn, a unique web store selling personalized gifts for all. Please take a moment to visit their site and sign up for the monthly newsletter offering discounts and special offers to Music Liner Notes readers.
My husband
Pour gin, vermouth, and Campari into a chilled Old Fashioned glass over ice; garnish with a slice of orange.
Although my neutral position on crochet may be swayed if I started to use higher quality materials in my crochet projects. Cotton/Acrylic from KnitPicks is not exactly MCN or MCS (Merino Cashmere Silk ie. Madelinetosh Pashmina).
It's their behavior that's important. Wandering aimlessly, acting aggressive for no apparent reason, or just sitting in one place showing a total lack of concern for people it has seen....these are behaviors to worry about. Note that I'm not hoping to give you hard-and-fast rules on how to tell if an animal is rabid. That can only be definitively determined after a post-mortem analysis of the critter suspected to be rabid.
little ones and Judy's infectious laugh.
You know the saying "the camera adds 10 pounds", I believe there should be an addition to that stating pictures posted to Facebook add another ten.
"Prevent future suffering."
When I did my research for my children’s book I went amongst a lot of other places to the Barbier-Mueller museum in Geneva, Switzerland. This one had just opened a new exhibition at that time about masks from all around the world. I absolutely loved that exhibition, which is still on until September 16th. Since they didn’t have a catalogue then, I did many sketches of the various masks I saw there and which inspired me. It was kind of creepy being watched by so many ancient masks, but at the same time it makes you think where and when they were used and how significant they were to their original owners. It makes me tingle all over to see something so beautiful and rough like the designs of ancient tribes.
The amount of stuff that our small family has accumulated is absolutely astounding. We have a 2,200 square foot house (thats 12 rooms) thats just bursting with STUFF. We hope to list our home in 4-6 weeks. The amount of work we need to do before that is staggering, but it is possible. The neat freak inside of me (you should see my moms house) is coming out.
What we are going to do now, is to take a file stored in an open access area of the file system, and use the cp command to copy it to your unixstuff directory.
In the satirical interview with director Spike Jonze conducted by Perkus Tooth (it's safe to assume this is actually Jonathan Lethem, "Perkus Tooth" being the name of a character from Lethem's novel Chronic City) printed in the booklet for the upcoming Criterion release of Jonze's Being John Malkovich, Tooth, or "Tooth," gets going early on the joke with this:
Also as a youngster, a feisty, short, red-haired great grandmother would often visit and occasionally babysit. She was old as dirt, but played a mean game of tag with us little ones. Her feistiness was attributed to the fact that she had red hair and Irish ancestors. As a preschooler I found the red hair issue confusing as I knew her to wear wigs over her gray hair. But, she was feisty and definitely had an Irish ancestor … so the two clearly must go together.
I am now in a mad addiction for Calvin Klein Underwear, which I find very useful to buy on Net-a-porter sales (because at the Outnet you will never find your size, or the matching pair of briefs and bras). Other than that, I did buy my first Jimmy Choos thanks to their lovely job in reducing these shoes’ ridiculously high price tags.
I said, “No, entertaining my Cousin Harold. He’s a writer, too.” I neglected to mention that Harold did his writing on various indoor Poop Room walls.
A man turns back. He pulls me to my feet and urges me on.
Their frail deeds might have danced in a green bay,
And since I absolutely avoid all types of religious debates with my mom, and since I am not in the habit of being in any way rude to her, I didn’t say, “It can’t be an answer to prayer if I didn’t actually pray.” Instead I went on to tell her why it happened so quickly (both the reason I was sure of and the reason I suspected).
help me
Karla
GARROSH: Um, what’s this?
Naturally, I hope that my critical voice is of interest to someone out there...which is partly why I'm finding Wood's politically minded brand of criticism to be so refreshing and even important—possibly a model to aspire to. I want my criticism to matter, dammit!
Looks like Blaine usurped Finn as male Glee captain because this is now firmly the Blaine Anderson show.
Notice this is not about arguing the merits of the bill. Maybe it's a terrible bill. Maybe it won't do what it's supporters claim it will do. (And what a surprise that would be.) But how will we know? They're refusing to debate the thing at all.
I am trying to win some cash to help with my wedding expenses.
I'm really sad right now, it is not about him but ok. I've got my period and I'm crying over everything, I'll just feel stupid when it ends. I overthink much more than when I overthink normally. That's why I wrote all that, but it is all true, the thing is that I don't ever think about it when I'm normal.
I am an optimist. It does not seem too much use being anything else.
is introducing eaters to pancakes beyond the normal realm. Leah Wilcox, the owner of Babycakes, says that the concept is “pancakes like you have never seen them before, inspired by delicious, savory, sweet, decadent pancakes in every flavor imaginable.” Wilcox, a Kendall College
So if you've not been to a meeting for a while, or you'd like to join us for the first time, we'll see you on Tuesday January 11 at 8pm at the Coney.
1. The Blue Plate Diner -- I went ovo-lacto here since I'd read nothing but great reviews about their omelets, however, there are a few vegan choices, such as tofu scrambles and burritos (more choices at lunch and dinner). I went for "The S.M.A," which was stuffed with spinach and mushrooms, and topped with sliced avocado. I also added some cheddar cheese for good measure. It was the fluffiest and largest omelet I've ever had. The side potatoes were crispy cubes of well-spiced tastiness. And the toast, well, pretty typical toast for Salt Lake, which is to say, Sourdough-based and not my speed. Otherwise, a big bang for the buck. Avoid the vegan sausage.
chase
Okay ... so decided to add teeny heart leaves ... also utilizing another (and one of my fave stitches learned from Betty) ... Bullions! I make two of them ... adding extra wraps to make it longer than the base length ... and they bow a bit ... then I tack each in place to form the heart ... & fill in with satin stitch. I think they look better in person than they seem here.
Allen sat out Game 1 due to lingering pain with a right ankle that will require surgery after the season to remove bone spurs. Rivers had dubbed Allen at “50/50″ before Sunday’s game, but he was unable to go. Allen was back on the floor getting up shots as the team prepared to practice Monday afternoon, but Rivers suggested he didn’t think Allen would be ready for Game 2.
“I went through my usual list of questions as we drank and danced and his answers were all I hoped for,” she assured her friend.“
As she sits lonely looking out the window
I would like to wear my hair as close to its natural state of curliness as possible but I realize that because I’m getting married the beginning of September in South Carolina my hair will need some help so that it doesn’t get super-frizzy or super-big, or both. I’ve been playing around with hot rollers to see how I like the big curls, playing around with curling irons to see how I like the more “controlled” curl, and I’ve been looking at various hairstyles if I were to actually straighten it. I don’t like the big curls because it also makes my hair super-big, Charlie’s Angel’s kind of big (the original Angels). And I don’t like the curling iron curls because they drop about an hour afterwards.
Secondly, I studied art history at uni with a much beloved feminist professor. We were discussing the Cabanel painting of the Birth of Venus in contrast to another of its time, Manet’s Olympia. My professor taught us that what made Olympia so modern and (at the time) shocking was the eye contact and mental engagement of the subject, whereas Cabanel painted his model with her mental organ pinned down by her hand. In a weird way, I’m tying this back to hats. Your brain, probably the most sexy body part you’ve got, is inside that head of yours, so cap it off with something worthy of what’s going on in there. Don’t pin it down with ridculous cheap looking details. Go for quality. Go for something that makes you feel confident and then sashay into a room like Pippa down the aisle.
Burp....
Week 7: Building Your Virtual Back Office
the smell of freshly cut hay,
Dies/Punches - Cheery Lynn Designs French Pastry doily and Martha Stewart edge punch
He answered, " I will give you your answer tomorrow... "
Decided we should not see
the kids are napping/quiet-timing.
Facts
While following others' blogs through the years, I would always get SO excited to see the ultrasound picture pop up in the blogroll when someone would announce their pregnancy. Now, it's our turn and I hope you are all as equally excited as we are! We got to tell my dad, stepdad and lots of friends last week while we were in Seattle. It was so wonderful to see the surprise, shock and joy on their faces.
But the fate of the species is unimportant compared with having had a hand in bringing that fate into being.
Brain Candy:
Not only do they pay bupkis, they don't even have a beach house in Hawaii! Cheap-ass bastards.
It is then that the Tower’s helical super-symmetry becomes evident on every scale, in every location.
I am deeply concerned that the Australian Government is selling a ‘patent’ on our daily bread to foreign biotech corporations.
With my upcoming travel plans, I spend a lot of time performing internet searches on various European cities. That is how I stumbled upon the Let’s Go site, which contains a wealth of valuable information about popular tourist destinations, from where to sleep to what to wear.
when we can do it all again.
Lately I've been seriously getting into Highlife tunes from Benin City (no relations to Benin the country). Benin City is the capital of Edo state in Southern Nigeria and birthplace of Sir Victor Uwaifo. I hope you will enjoy this music as much as I do. All these songs are really long, I only managed to fit seven of them into this mix that runs well over 1 hour... I don't like to cut tracks short. To me the length of these tracks matches the trance inducing nature of the music.
I tried on a pair of jeans the next size down and I'm just not quite there yet, maybe about 5 more pounds and I will be. So I will have to keep wearing these for the time being despite the daily protests of my mother.
Listen below and let me know what you think.
Now to re-read this with our socialist spectacles on, we need to note two things. First of all, Nietzsche speaks of an essentially symbolic or emotional threat, but whereas he projects the source and essence of suffering onto the sufferers, we can see what’s really at issue – those whose happiness relies on the suffering of others must separate their happiness from any consciousness of that suffering. They must repress it from their awareness, and must deny it to themselves, in order that they can continue to accept and maintain the system that produces it. They need to have their cake and eat it too.
Here is the finished product
thick pouring cream, to serve (or creme fraiche)
It has been confirmed that Jane's Addiction is playing the party. I'm beyond words!
ePacket can be used for packages up to 2,000g (EMS is 30,000g) and is trackable online and insured. ePacket is not as expensive as EMS and only slightly slower with packages from Japan to the USA, for example, taking 5 days. ePacket parcels are treated as First Class mail in the USA.
On the other side of a week, I can still taste the disappointment. Not just from not getting to see him, but from the end of a crush that consumed far too many of my thoughts during the months it was going on.
A swarm. Best strategy is to keep moving and use broad, sweeping strikes. Tawa instructed. And don't give them a chance to jump on you all at once.
So I'm driving through Hollywood in a ton of traffic, and at one point I came to a stop behind a sleek black convertible sports car in the left-turn lane. When the light turned to a green left-turn arrow, he just sat there and after the car behind me honked I gave a little honk myself just to play along, and I guess the guy didn't like being pulled away from the text he was sending because he raised his arm up high and gave us all the finger.
Ignored - 4
It is believed that John was a cousin to Jesus because Salome is identified as the wife of Zebedee, the mother of James and John, two of the Apostles of Jesus, and also as the sister of Mary, mother of Jesus. As family they no doubt grew up together and likely were best friends since childhood. John without question felt he knew Jesus extremely well, knew his nature, and the heart of him, and there is no doubt that John loved Jesus dearly. This was a bond likened unto David and Jonathan. So what is John trying to tell us about the nature of Jesus in this story?
This lovely award has been forwarded to me by Jasline from Food Is My Life and Kajal from Purple Chronicle. I am honored that both Jasline and Kajal has forwarded this award to me. Both ladies have beautiful sites with lovely recipes and musings, be sure to stop by and say hello.
I left Sharon to watch the grand prix on iplayer and headed for the pub. Frankly I was half way drunk before I got here, so the two pints I'm planning to have will find me either fully drunk at home or in a ditch halfway there.
9.) Glee (the plot is stupid but I just love the songs, and if you don’t think while watching it, you’ll enjoy it)
Had a nerve wracking evening. Went out to feed last night, brought the horses in, fed them as usual. Emma wouldnt eat. Now if you know this horse, that is not a good thing! I pulled her feed and caught her. I then took her out to see if she was interested in grass at all and walked her some. No go, all she would do is push at the grass. This mare has never refused food in her life! In fact its hard to keep her out of the fresh grass when I take her out in the yard to hose her off or whatever. She stretched a little and peed while I had her out. I brought her back in and locked her outside gate, she usually comes and goes as she pleases.
The compositions that Monroe called “true songs” are among my favorites. They manage to sound as old as the hills, even as they tell tales drawn directly from Big Mon’s outsized biography. The number featured here, “My Little Georgia Rose,” is said to be one of these “true songs,” and now is perhaps not the occasion to spell out its presumed meaning in full. Let’s just say that a painful revelation may lie beneath its cheerful veneer. By most accounts, Monroe was complex and often difficult, yet however we may judge him as a man, surely a large part of his genius as an artist was his fearlessness in putting the whole sprawling mess of his life out there in his music.
The decor was very rustic and had a real buzz about it. There were lots of staff running around a huge open plan kitchen right in the dining room, which was great as you could see how all the food was cooked (... another good sign).
A truck comes to a halt on the Syria-Turkey border, a group of refugees from the violence-torn country piles out, and only a barbed wire fence stands between them and freedom.
Some critics of Epicurus claim that he doesn’t factor in the complex reaction to the finality of human life, particularly when such strong bonds exist between us. But this, again, is not unique to humanity. Apes, whales, dolphins, and elephants form bonds and the death of loved ones is extremely painful and traumatic. Elephants are known to visit the graves of their family members and observe in what appears to be a solemn state when in the presence of the bones of their ancestors.
And like every video library, there are those you lend out.
I just so happened to see the freshly pressed post about Positano, on the Eat and relish blog, so I couldn’t help but snoop around for more-which led me to another great post about Rome, and a few more on Italian dishes and recipes! Make sure you check it out! Loads of fabulous photos as well, which, for me, really sells it when it comes to travel and food blogs! I know, I’m a sucker for pretty things! Definitely gonna keep an eye on this one.
